&gt;"The message is 'It's better to wait until you're married to bear or father children,' " Horn said. "The only 100% effective way of getting there is abstinence." Abortion?
I've seen a few of these stories over the last couple of days.  Why is it in every case votes for Democrats are incorrectly showing up as votes for Republicans?  Why are none the other way around? 
My Halloween display is the Spanish Inquisition. /Confess! Confess! Confess!
Right.  You keep saying that we will lose because of the "Defeatists", but you never actually say what to do about that problem.  All problems, no credible solutions.  Your singular point throughout this entire thread is that we are losing - or will lose - because of Blitzer, et al reporting and Americans reacting badly to it.  According to you, the current war in Iraq can be won if we just toughen up.  I disagree. I think it's more complex than that.  I also think the insurgents have never had any problems finding reasons to fight.  If you truly think they only fight because there is dissent in America, then you are dead wrong. Quell defeatism and we win?  Hardly. Gen. Odom knows more about the REALITY of fighting wars than some tough guy couch-philosopher (not offense meant).  Consider coming up with actual, tangible solutions and not oddball philosphies about "fighting" and "defeatism".   
The US have just put TWO carrier groups in the Persian Gulf for military extercizes. Is this an election stunt? It's being reported in several other news sources: http://www.upi.com/SecurityTerrorism/view.php?StoryID=20061027-042958-6662r  http://www.news.navy.mil/search/display.asp?story_id=26364  http://www.debkafile.org/article.php?aid=1223
not a proper poll if people refuse to vote
&gt;Unfortunately, it quickly degenerated into porn you say that like its a bad thing
Your lucky, Dick peppered me.
I don't get quantum mechanics either, but that doesn't mean I can't calculate the energy of a photon. Perhaps you could try explaining, or link to someone who does?
And put those expenditures on the federal books? Blasphemy!
I hope not: * Java is great if you're a huge corporation who doesn't have trouble throwing more bodies at a problem.  That doesn't quite do it for smaller firms who have to turn around more functionality quicker. * PHP is... well, I don't think it's the most pleasant tool out there. * I spent a lot of time and effort pushing Tcl for the web.  It's a good fit, but without some momentum behind it, it's not going anywhere. So... Rails is a pretty nice fit, in my opinion.  Python is not a bad alternative, but for entirely subjective reasons, I think I prefer Ruby.
Is there such a thing as sem seo certification.
The author of the original piece doesnt say boycott them permanently, rather boycott them so that the current generation of websites die, a new generation of more fairer ones emerge
start using torpark:  http://www.torrify.com/
Discusses the growing popularity of values-based leadership in  the political arena.
If it was google, it would be irrelevant.  Google employees get all the coke and hookers they want, anyway. Ah, the glamorous world of advertising.
&gt; That paragraph really confuses me. You seem to be saying that, as a defeatist, you not only think America will lose but that you want America to lose (Why do you assume that none of your fellow defeatists have the same understanding?). If you know that defeatism will lead to America losing, why would you hold that position unless America losing is what you want? I haven't claimed to be a defeatist. I am pointing out that if you are 100% certain that America will lose in Iraq (because of defeatists!), I do not understand a distinction between your position and defeatism. &gt; If you know that defeatism will lead to America losing, why would you hold that position unless America losing is what you want? As a hypothetical? I am apparently unclear on what a defeatist is, if it is not someone who believes that America will suffer defeat. Perhaps one would still be a defeatist in the scenario you describe if they believe that America will lose in any case, and that withdrawal is a more desirable scenario. Nah, they're probably just pussies. &gt; However, not being a defeatist myself, that fact does not change my view that we should press on in Iraq with a full committment to winning. Right. I got that before. What *would* change your view? That's what I keep asking. What is the distinction between Iraq and a clusterfuck that we should immediately exit? You sound proud to be incapable of identifying such a situation, which would indict your credibility when you say that Iraq is not one. &gt; We have been committed by our elected government (both the Dems and the GOP) to a war in Iraq and, since we are already there and the war is started, the right thing now is to resolve it as quickly and with as few casualties as possible. Right. And who opposes that, exactly? The point is that Lt. Gen. William Odon, and some other relatively intelligent people think the best way to resolve it as quickly and with as few casualties as possible is to leave Iraq immediately. I don't necessarily agree, but I *really* don't understand your apparent suggestion that the only way to win is to keep your head down and shut up. That sounds like a great way to kill another million people.
Please, I spent two hours and went to eleven stores in NYC today and found ZERO candy corn. I really want some :/ I will give you beer if you give me Candy Corn. Message me if interested.
What?
I like what bonkeydog said. Bush should go perform unnatural acts with dead barnyard animals.  Just kiddin, he's a great guy.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jotspot
No, oatsy, they don't. Which is the point Dubya is missing.
scheduling a power nap was still in fashion a couple years ago. only difference today is you might get interrupted by your blackberry going off!
Well, consider that the votes on this story are 1781 ups to 701 downs, so the ratio is at least 2.5, which is significant. Aside from that, the site started out as a programming-centric site, and programming communities are overwhelmingly male. Probably the ratio is lower than it was then. Anyway, I don't think saying that Reddit is mostly male says that men are special or intellectual.
They bring their Churches inside our bedrooms?  We should fuck in their churches then.  I am quite sure it isn't what they want.
His name is Mike Stark, from Calling all Wingnut. Here is his response: Letter from Mike Stark Richmond Times-Dispatch Oct 31, 2006 The following is a letter to NBC29 from Mike Stark, the man who was tackled for a comment he made at Senator Allen's campaign stop in Charlottesville on Tuesday. My name is Mike Stark. I am a law student at the University of Virginia, a marine, and a citizen journalist. Earlier today at a public event, I was attempting to ask Senator Allen a question about his sealed divorce record and his arrest in the 1970s, both of which are in the public domain. His people assaulted me, put me in a headlock, and wrestled me to the ground. Video footage is available here, from an NBC affiliate. I demand that Senator Allen fire the staffers who beat up a constituent attempting to use his constitutional right to petition his government. I also want to know why Senator Allen would want his staffers to assault someone asking questions about matters of public record in the heat of a political campaign. Why are his divorce records sealed? Why was he arrested in the 1970s? And why did his campaign batter me when I asked him about these questions. George Allen defends his support of the Iraq war by saying that our troops are defending the ideals America stands for. Indeed, he says our troops are defending our very freedom. What kind of country is it when a Senator's constituent is assaulted for asking difficult and uncomfortable questions? What freedoms do we have left? Maybe we need to bring the troops home so that they can fight for freedom at George Allen's campaign events. Demanding accountability should not be an offense worthy of assault. I will be pressing charges against George Allen and his surrogates later today. George Allen, at any time, could have stopped the fray. All he had to do was say, "This is not how my campaign is run. Take your hands off that man." He could have ignored my questions. Instead he and his thugs chose violence. I spent four years in the Marine Corps. I'll be damned if I'll let my country be taken from me by thugs that are afraid of taking responsibility for themselves. It just isn't the America I know and love. Somebody needs to take a stand against those that would bully and intimidate their fellow citizens. That stand begins right here, right now. W. Michael Stark   
&gt;How is reddit fundamentally any different (insert a bunch of websites I dont post on here) Clearly the difference is that I am here
Does this mean there will be plenty of surveys to fill out for magazine offers?
Not safe for my critique. /really bad drawing
A better question might be, what are some of the newer alternatives out there?   
Lame. Why not use SVG?
"Residents dance in the streets with jubilation Tuesday after U.S. and Iraqi troops ended a weeklong security cordon of Baghdad's" LOL!!
They are completely unnecessary, they restrict innovation, they allow for the collection of monopoly rent on *an idea*, we could go on.
&gt;we also note your IP. This is used exclusively for anti-cheating purposes. Why dont you hash the ips and discard them?
I guess Quayle was kinder and gentler.
Excellent article. Thanks for posting the link.
Well, they should have fun in court for both civil and criminal charges. They forget only elected people have no accountability, not their foot soldiers. This take down probably cost them each about 30k.
Steeeeal Industry ... geddit? Geddit?
It is pretty terrible what these animals go through. But, nobody said that being at the bottom of the food chain was sweet. Those animals are serving their purpose. Until we develop some sort of technology to actualy create some sort of manufactured beef, this wont change. The same can be said for humans. "No human should have to live like this" I can then point to a video of a guy working 60 hours a week whose wife just left him and the neighbor just ran over his dog.
Shame the same argument applies to Americans of European descent.  I wonder how many people like this realise they are immigrants themselves?
I'll bet it's cool in the summer and warm when it's cold outside.
It was not a formal declaration of war, merely an unconstitutional cession of Congress' war power to the executive.
The origin is fairly obvious.  Try talking with your tongue stuck in your cheek and listen to how you sound.
90% of people should never even be allowed to log a single word into a single computer for any job, anywhere, ever.
I don't know about anyone else but I just assume everyone keeps track of everything I do on the internet it's just easier that way.
Sorry, I'm no fan of Bush (that's an understatement), I but I definitely feel like Kerry made a mistake here and is now trying to change the meaning of his words retroactively. His exact words were "You know, education, if you make the most of it, you study hard, you do your homework and you make an effort to be smart, you can do well. If you don't, you get stuck in Iraq." And now he's saying he was talking about Bush?  Bush isn't "stuck in Iraq" in the way this sentence implied, the troops are, so that's a little illogical.  It's a nice attempt at PR spin, but it doesn't work.
Bush is such a troll.
"And the only time I think about guns now is when deer season opens and my neighbors fill the woods and meadows with their shooting." Redneck!
ewwww bloooody
What a great place for a Halloween party.
hello
honestly, I think I have a pretty good idea how to weed out the undesirable element of the reddit community... Charge $5 to join.  One-time fee, good forever, etc.  Then you'd see the people who really like it here (and probably have jobs) happily drop the fiver, and the 15 year old retards go back to digg. Hell, the reddit guys could donate the money to charity or something.  Pretty sure that would go a long way toward keeping the stupid quotient down (lower than it is, at least).
These guys weren't (as) corrupt going in compared to today, but it's obvious the people easily forget such a contract after 4 years, let alone 12.
According to my sources, it was $6.2 million. P.S. My sources include my ass.  P.P.S. Don't benchmark against YouTube, as that is theoretically a TV ad business with much higher rates than any ad a reddit user would sit through.
Right. But by the same token users today are trusted to give their own submissions proper descriptions, submit them to an appropriate subreddit, and so on. That probably ought to be changed at some point, but it's not specifically an NSFW issue, which is why I passed over it above.
It wasn't "al Qaedia" before the war started.  And now there is a good chance it will be. Who's fault is this?
A realistic approach to the recent uproar about job aggregators like Indeed, Simply Hired, Jobster, and others.
&gt; I predict fewer anti-establishment articles If that means fewer flawed, badly-referenced rants about American politics, then that would be fantastic. Particularly for those of us who aren't American and don't care about its political system. 
It remembers every time you voted up an article that was critical of the administration, was soft on terrorism, or that did not give Bill O'Reilly the respect he deserves. In short, enjoy you plane ride to the middle east!
DEMAND THIS!
You're talking about two different things. 1. Passing a law which rubbishes a treaty is one thing, the Americans did not do this. 2. Breaking a law willfully by illegally invading Iraq is another.  They did do this. Whether or not anyone in the United States has the balls to call President Bush and his regime on the criminal acts that they committed is another topic altogether.   
Working with limitations is what makes this interesting. We tried to do something similar for our javascript demo, but would have used transparent scaled gifs/pngs for the right triangles and thought that would be horribly slow. This is clever because it manages to draw the right triangles so cheaply.
And if you don't recognize Alec Baldwin, and put "I don't know", that should also count against you?
*"Where can 'white America' go to understand the changing world around us?"* Certainly not from that subtly racist site--how about a class in intercultural relations?
So should I not be killing insects infesting my house too? I mean they are "gods special creatures" right? Meat tastes good. Even titor said that I will probably die of CJD - but you know what? I dont care.  Besides, I sit in a cube "cage" all day, doing things I dont perticularly want to do. Being tortured and thrown against walls by management and lusers alike. This is modern society - No creature is happy. But when I dream of a sweet juicy steak and a nice cold beer after work - that makes me happy. Don't you dare take that away, or you might just find yourself as the replacement dinner item!
Such logic and clarity! Sign me up!
100 million pesos and lifetime subscription  to Women'sWearDaily,Scoop,Cookie,DNR,Soap Weekly and so on.
what's wrong with furl? I use it to save pages all the time. The advantage of furl over other social bookmarking engines is that furl saves the page contents for you AND allows you to search within that saved content. By comparison delicious is lame.
I wouldn't even want them running around my town, but unfortunately I made the mistake of going to a college that shares a town with Clarkson University, and it's especially ugly on bar nights.
She's been corrupted ever since she lost it to Nick.
He missed a _much_ faster way of decomposing arbitrary triangles in terms of right triangles. Take a look at his diagram, and imagine drawing a full bounding rectangle around the triangle. The triangle can be described as the bounding rectangle minus three right triangles in the box. So to draw a triangle in green you'd create a green div for the bounding box and three black divs for the right triangle complements. Any reason this wouldn't work in CSS?
Bat Ass Crazy....  I actually went to college in Lakeland,FL which is about 20 min from her home town of Bartow. Sorry to say, most people that I met that are from Polk County are also, Bat Ass Crazy.  Some interesting "facts" on Polk County that I learned while in school. (Can't find any documentation on any of them) -largest number of trailers/mobile homes per capita in the US -largest representation on Jerry Springer per capita in the US -Largest producer of Crystal Meth in the US -Polk county is pronounced "poke" county Katherine Harris can keep that place. Lets take everything else  
The only sites currently running these "massive buildup" and "imminent strike" sites are all extremely biased sites (such as very pro-Israel sites like this one, or the more extreme conspiracy sites). I lend no credibility to any of this stuff, unlike the Iraq war run-up where the stories were much more reliable.
*Any reason this wouldn't work in CSS?* Several.
For India, that's not particularly crazy. They should videotape some of the intersections in Old Delhi, where you may well be passed on the right by a cow and cut off by a team of men hauling lumber by hand while autorickshaws (those golf cart-looking things) dart around you and come within inches of hitting you. In the dark. With no street signs or signals anywhere. Also, everyone is cursing at you in Hindi, and constantly on their horn. Man, I miss that country.
But he's also a Marine. And they're not known for giving up a fight.
That's pretty much how it is. The lack of rage, and the low speeds due to congestion, mean that they have very few car accidents.
Exactly, instead, Sen. Kerry verbally assaults our military.  Insinuating they are not intelligent.  Without apology.   Democrats and Republicans alike are equally at fault for acting stupid.  Now we have to choose the lesser of two evils to run our government. While I am proud to be American, I am ashamed that we have spiraled into this means of electing our gov. representatives.
Please enlighten. I don't do web stuff, but I thought you could have overlapping divs without any issues?
Ask Sir Edmund Hillary. It is *not* lame.  You can't possibly be a geek and think it is.
It would work, but then you can't overlay triangles on top of each other.
 Yawn. Actually, he was asked to leave, several times. When he didn't, they put him in a headlock and removed him. My grandfather, if asked that question of his wife, would have slapped the shit out the guy...he got off easy. And let him sue. And sue and sue and sue. The GOP can pick up the cheque. It's the cost of doing business (campaigning), and should be a line-item thing in any campaign budget, no matter what Party you belong to: if a wingnut interrupts your gig, you get removed. It's the same rule at baseball games and concerts. And the fact that Allen is GOP has nothing to do with it. Any candidate's staff would have done the same thing if they are any good at all. 
&gt; It would work, but then you can't overlay triangles on top of each other. That's true. It would be enough for the specific demo he's showing, though.
A very cool, interactive piece about how basic scientific discoveries may be coming to an end. Perspectives of the big guns (scientists, philosophers) are worked in on a sort of liberal/conservative scale for scientists.
Okay, I'll bite. Let's say he was a suicide bomber. Why the fuck would they tackle him in the first place, and throw him against a glass wall? With all those assumed explosives in his bookbag? It would leave Allen's campaign open to a very messy liability lawsuit. Arrogant jackassery makes them treat everyone like a potential threat.
They are paid to take a bullet if necessary.  You never know when a moonbat is going to turn up.
because anybody's better than the present ruling party?
At least they didn't shoot you in the face ;)
No, actually what I meant was that each of the points that the national review was complaining about, the Dems should be shouting from the rooftops.  With a few changes this could be a liberal piece on the strengths of the Dems.  For the record, I don't believe that the Dems are soft on terror, that the tax cuts need to be abolished so that we can chip away at the national debt and that taking the first steps towards ending the war on drugs is a good thing.
Actually, I think it's kind of awesome.
Sorry, didn't notice the sarcasm on the first pass. :P
Was that a bit rough?  Sure.  But there was a day and a time when nobody would have blinked twice at someone getting their ass kicked for asking a man "Why did you spit on your first wife?" loudly in public.  I don't condone violence for the sake of violence, but I sure don't condone being an asshole, either.  World seems pretty full of them these days, and full of people willing to stand up for them, too.
I hope that reddit got all it deserved. I am devoted member, yet that could all change tommorow when I find my next favorite site. If things change for the worse, I simply find the next new, new thing, ala Jim Clark. I am affixed to nothing and no one. It's not personal, just business, and how I came to become financially independent myself. Good luck guys!
&gt;But there was a day and a time when nobody would have blinked twice at someone getting their ass kicked for asking a man "Why did you spit on your first wife?" loudly in public. Modded up the parent.   Take President Andrew Jackson, for example.  Hey, Jackson got into a duel with a man who dared to question his wife's honour.  Perhaps that's what we should start doing to moonbats with backpacks like Mike Stark: give moonbat a gun, give the candidate a gun, and let 'em take 10 paces and fire. Assuming Allen prevailed (and I think he would), he'd be more likely to get my vote.
Why do you have sex with children, keelan?  Why do you beat your wife?  Why, for the love of God, do you use Windows? I'm not protesting about you, I'm just asking questions.
You'd think a professional "citizen journalist" like Mike Stark would be professional enough to remove the backpack before engaging in his "journalistic pursuits." But not Mikey.  He deserved to get his ass kicked.  He got off light.
This is stupid. Just what Microsoft wants, Congress talking about a Monopoly. Not going to happen. Ever.
The interleaving of QuickCheck property specification, alongside design-by-type-declaration during development is best practice these days. This is a useful glimpse into that process, and gives a nice flavour of the kind of rigorous design you can develop with only a little effort.
They probably knew he was just a nut job.  But the backpack creates plausible denial, and besides, it was probably really fun to rough him up a little and scare him enough so that he doesn't try stupid shit like this again.
Stark isn't that cute.
With President Bush's popularity ratings in the 30s, Republican candidates aren't exactly lining up to stand at his side. Mother Jones magazine has assembled a collection of lame excuses offered up on behalf of Republican candidates who declined to appear with President Bush or Vice President Cheney.
Despite your snide comments, I still believe Jed Bartlet is the greatest President we have had in the last six years!
Newark is the worst international airport in the country, at least that's my opinion.  I think security there is probably worse off than others.  That being said it seems unlikely that airport security would actually catch someone trying to sneak a weapon by.  People who want to do so know what the security rules are, because anyone who flies often knows what they are.  There are always going to be ways around them, what we have now is the cloudy illusion of security.
He had me going until "Russia can be ignored because it will play a spoiler role in any case." Putin accurately predicted that Iraq was going to be a mess. Ignoring major players is not the way such matters are dealt with. I'm surprized the guy can accept nuclear Iran but cannot get over Soviet Union.
This article is unbelievable bullshit. Um so the strategy is 1. Get 100% of the (maybe) 37% who still approve of the president to vote republican in the 50 key house districts, and some how the other 66% of the nation- what doesn't show up to the polls? 2. Rely on the "early ballots" to pad totals 3. Use the fact that some districts are stong republican to claim against all polls that reps will take them - just because.   Let's look at the Energize the base rally covered in the article.  It's  rally in Sugar Land Texas.  Let's see Sugar Land Texas... that would be Tom Delay's old seat, which is currently polling as   **TX-22** 10/30 Zogby Nick Lampson(D) 36% Shelley Gibbs(R) 28% 10/24 Zogby Nick Lampson(D) 36%\tNick Lampson(R) 35% 1/12 U of Houston Nick Lampson \t30% Shelley Gibbs 22% The Kicker? Gibbs is a **Write-in Candidate** which means everyone who votes for her has to write her name on the ballot!!!  Is Bush going to tip this race in which the Dem has been leading since January? No way in hell. This is the start of a national rally? A *Write-in seat*!!! Man I almost feel bad for the Republicans. And what about other races? If we look at the [RT strategies tracking polls](http://constituentdynamics.com/mw/2006/index2.php) we see 198 sure Dem seats. 24 strong lean dems. and 18 lean dems, which is looking without even including the 2 ties as potential 49 seat majority for Dems of 242. The 198 also includes 14 unpolled districts which includes TX-22.  lets break down the 14 unpolled by RT *indicated incumbent **CO-03** Easy Dem Call 9/17 John Salazar(D)* 52% Scott Tipton(R) 41% SurveyUSA 8/14 John Salazar(D)* 53% Scott Tipton(R) 42% SurveyUSA 2004 Kerry (D) 51% Bush (R) 47%  Election **GA-08** This district was redistricted after Jim Marshall's(D) 2004 election  No Polls report http://www.robertsilvey.com/notes/2006/09/ga08_house_elec.html 2004 Marshall(D)* 63% ?(R) 37% 2004 Kerry(D) 24% Bush(R) 76% 10/16 Bush Approve/Disapprove 44%/53% Bush Approval Tracking Graph for GA http://www.surveyusa.com/client/PollTrack.aspx?g=6d651a4c-cf34-4b09-86cf-fc9da17e801b **GA-12** This district was redistricted after John Barrow's(D) 2004 election  No Polls report http://www.robertsilvey.com/notes/2006/09/ga12_house_elec.html 7/11 Barrow(D)* 54% Burns(R) 43% 2004 Barrow(D)* 52% Burns(R) 48% 2004 Kerry(D) 52% Bush(R) 48% 10/16 Bush Approve/Disapprove 44%/53% Bush Approval Tracking Graph for GA http://www.surveyusa.com/client/PollTrack.aspx?g=6d651a4c-cf34-4b09-86cf-fc9da17e801b Will Burns pull it out this time? **IL-17** No Polls  This is Lane Evans seat and 11 term Democrat who is stepping down this cycle do to Parkinsons. 2004 Evans(D) 61% Zinga(R) 39% 2004 Kerry(D) 52% Bush(R) 48% 2006 Phil Hare(D)  Andrea Zinga(R)   - No Polls   Zinga, a TV news, anchor barely won her 2006 primary and is in Hastert's state which is taking a blow from the Foley Scandal. Most Rank this as a "safe" dem seat Charlie Cook rates it D+5. **KS-03** Call Dem 3 time incumbent Dennis Moore is looking for a 4th term, Scott Schwab after winning the primary was not picked up by the NRCC Since Schwab is actively not being endorsed by NRCC this seat seems pretty safe. 2004 Dennis Moore(D)* 55%  Kris Korbach(R) 43% 2004 Kerry(D) 55% Bush(R) 43% 2006 Dennis Moore(D)  Scott Schwab(R)   - No Polls   **LA-02** Easy Call Dem This is William Jefferson(D) the dem who got caught with $100,000 in cash in his freezer and was run out of Congress by his own party.  Largely a Democratic seat historically In the Corrupt LA this seat doesn't look to change parties   any time soon.   State Rep Karen Carter is running against a *dozen* other candidates for this seat! 2004 Kerry(D) 79% Bush(R) 21% 2006 Karen Carter(D) ?(R/Other) - No Poll Report http://www.dailykos.com/story/2006/10/9/115023/848 With the Katrina Disaster being blamed on Bush **LA-03** Easy call Dem In the past has been a Republican District.  This election is all about Katirna and Melancon was out and active during the storm trying to help his constituents. 10/10 Charlie Melancon(D)* 48% Romero(R) 23% 2004 Charlie Melancon(D)*  50.2% Billy Tauzin III(R) 49.8% 2004 Kerry(D) 51% Bush(R) 49% Report http://www.robertsilvey.com/notes/2006/09/la03_house_elec.html **OH-13** Easy Dem Call This is REp Sherrod Brown's*(D) seat who is currently heavily favored to win Dewine(R)'s Senate seat 7/17 Betty Sutton(D) 48% Craig Foltin(R) 30% 2004 Kerry(D) 67% Bush(R) 33% Flotin is Mayor of Lorrain Ohio. Not going to help in Brown's home district. **OR-05** Call Dem  David Reinhard's Freerepublic piece 10? Moore Information Darlene Hooley* 44% (D) Mike Ericson (R) 37%   (Internal Republican Poll)   2004 Kerry(D) 53% Bush(R) 44% report http://www.blueoregon.com/2006/10/hooley_vs_erick.html No National Republican attention here **SC-05** Easy Dem Call This is a strong Southern Dem district which looks to go Strongly for the Dem incumbent 10/25 Clemson U. John Spratt(D)* 61% Ralph Norman(R) 28% 10/11 Survey USA John Spratt(D)* 56% Ralph Norman(R) 42% 2004 Kerry(D) 63% Bush(R) 37% **SD-AL** Easy Call Dem Herseth won the seat in a close special election after Bill Janklow was convicted of Manslaughter in 2004! 8/2 Argus Leader Stephanie Herseth(D)* 60% Bruce Whalen(R) 26% 2004 Kerry(D) 53% Bush(R) 46% **TX-22** Covered in the header **UT-02** Easy Dem Call 9/25 Deseret Morning News Jim Matheson(D)* 60% Lavar Christensen(R) 24% 2004 Kerry(D) 55% Bush(R) 43% **WA-02** Easy Dem Call 10/24 SurveyUSA Rick Larsen(D)* 62%  ?(R) 33%  10/04 SurveyUSA Rick Larsen(D)* 60%  ?(R) 35% 08/30 SurveyUSA Rick Larsen(D)* 58%  ?(R) 35% 2004 Kerry(D) 64% Bush(R) 34%    Even if I want to be generous and give Karl a shot to make his point Dems still win the House. So of the 14 unpolled currently Dem seats where Karl Rove can have "secret data" no one knows about I'm going to be generous and call 10 Sure Dems. I'll even give you TX-22, IL-17, GA-8, and GA-12. I then give you half the lean dems which would be 9 seats (Unbelievable in this climate, I know but I'm being generous). I'll give you a quarter of the strong dems that would be 6 seats (Yeah the gifts keep on coming). I'll give you both ties, all the lean Rep and strong reps and even all 10 unpolled reps. So this still leaves Dems with a **15 seat Majority of 225!**  . Which is a good match for the current Intrade markets which are favoring a greater than 20 seat pickup at 57%. I don't care how you slice it the republicans are losing the house in a week. I would be interested to see if anyone- hey columbia1! can provide any data at all even to challenge the conservative worst case minimum 15 seat majority projected above.   
That's true, but how many people now use SVG on their sites?  I think it's more of an issue of getting the design crowd to do it rather than the IE team.
Considering that testosterone is the two F hormone (much like tequila is the two F alcohol) I think that the Republicons would find this advantageous. As males we're either going to fuck or fight and considering how "well" the "war on terrorism" is going I think they need a lot more sexually frustrated males to enlist.
200 quatloos!
A site called throwawayyourtv.com shouldn't be about what is on tv.
It's not al Qaedia now and there isn't a good chance of it happening, as long as American forces are there. Do you honestly believe that bin Laden and Co. can car bomb their way to victory? Yes, there are plenty of foreign fighters there, but are they increasing in number? Are they winning battles against our forces? No. It's Bush's fault we never have to worry about all the horrible things Saddam did and was *capable* of doing.   
John Kerry OMFG who cares!
The Iraqi populace largely supports al-Qaeda? What's your source? How are we hastening it if the only way it can become Terrorstan is if we pull out too early?
unbelievable.
The title should have read "Worst Interpretation of Racism Ever". There's nothing racist about this ad. Is it race based? Yes. Is it racist? No. Carlos Mencia said it best, "you can't be white and have a white pride sticker on your car".
That'd be great, as long as the feds don't have access to anything more powerful than an abacus... (The set of ipv4 addresses is fairly small.)
Ditto...  Well done!  And congrats to YCombinator too.
If you play, coach or have a child in hockey and you love Web 2.0 you will enjoy YourTeam!
It doesn't make sense that he, Kerry, a veteran who had the resources to avoid the draft if he had wanted to, would diss the troops in this manner. It makes far greater sense that he accidently truncated his speech.  Of *course* Bush is "stuck in Iraq" - his legacy will forever be about the failure that is the American invasion of Iraq and he will never rise above it. Ever.
Well yes, but I could learn to identify their faces and still know nothing about their politics.  So someone who takes this test and fails could improve their score without becoming a better voter.  The test measures a side effect of being a good voter, not good voterness itself.
The Brits are evil. They have finally figured a way to get Bush to back stem cell research.
Ignore it. Hide it.
We don't have to worry about all the horrible things the insurgents are doing either.  Because they are actually doing them. The foreign fighters are U.S. and U.K. "Are they winning battles against our forces?"  They might not "win" many battles but they are for sure winning the war.
Mainly because it gives you the option of reviewing your e-mails at a later time when you may not have a connection to the internet. Though I can't possibly think when that would be other than during a long airline flight.
I hate errors like this in computer system. One time i had finished paying off my tuition at the beginning of the year..and i realised that suddenly I owed the school about $14k. I called the school registar office and inquired why the computer system stated that i owed this much about over the phone. The registar checked my account on the computer , and within 10 seconds, they said that they made a mistake and the amount has been written off. I was like WTF? How can such an error been made? Is this how school predate for $$ from students?
Pure gold:  &gt; Authority is the greatest lie ever perpetrated against the human race.  It is the illusory notion that a group of humans who, regardless of being every bit as flawed as anyone else, should be entrusted with the responsibility of keeping the rest of us protected, paid, fed, sheltered and well medicated in pursuit of some muddled and ill-defined “greater good” of the collective whole.
&gt;"Surely, people would be convinced by the obvious correctness of my arguments, if only they weren't brainwashed!" That's actually not far from the truth. People in Europe, Canada, Asia and South America have much less trouble buying into the notion that the war had much more to do with oil than anything else, including terrorism and WMDs.  And I hope that by quoting the statement that the US media is not open, you're not implying that it is, because it is famously not open. Americans who are 'news junkies', that watch broadcast news most of the day every day are very ill informed. Freedom of the press in America ranks 44th in the world.
IGN has revealed the full list of virtual console games that will be available for the Wii between launch and the end of the year. Here are the games by console for which they were originally released.
&gt; Of course Bush is "stuck in Iraq" - his legacy will forever be about the failure that is the American invasion of Iraq and he will never rise above it. Ever. Yeah, but honestly, is that what was meant here?  The first part is about how lack of a good education puts you in Iraq.  Bush went to Yale (although it's admittedly hard to tell), which could hardly be considered a lack of education.  In fact, ironically, so did Kerry. I'm just being realistic.
maybe but the drinks are on Alexis and Steve Tonight !!!!!  Congrats Reddit
Well, no. Because then the statistical advantage just goes to the person making the call, who could look at which way the coin was facing before it was tossed.
Stark is a Marine?  LOL!  Then Stark looks like even *more* of a wanker-- he let an old man take him down? What Marine allows that?
[true](http://reddit.com/info/j8ef/comments/cj9cl)
I wanted to like this. the idea is cool, check in on the ol' "Contract with America" with a point-by-point critique - but then it only hits 3 issues, misreads the promises in the contract, and just blathers randomly about problems with this congress.    
&gt; The impeachment procedure is in two steps. The House of Representatives must first pass "articles of impeachment" by a simple majority.   &gt;  &gt; Next, the Senate tries the accused. In order to convict the accused, a two-thirds majority of the senators present is required. So unless the democrats win a two-thirds majority, it's extremely unlikely that he'll be convicted.
...And about 350 of 352 weapons if McGyver was the one running the test!
Take a good, hard look at that first point: &gt; FIRST, require all laws that apply to the rest of the country also apply equally to the Congress. This is the same group of congressmen who want to be exempt from the airport security rules that resulted from the legislation they passed.
Wow.  You can find *everything* in pi.  But only if it's normal.  And only if you have infinite time with which to compute it.  And only if you have infinite space in which to store it.  Those technologies are still under development.
No we must "stay the course" or else The Terrorists will win!
Crikey ... but they caught me trying to smuggle toothpaste across state lines a few weeks ago at LAX.  Idiots.
The whole advantage of using javascript to do these is that you can use them with non-rectangular regions using imagemap's. If you look closely at this one you will see that the image changes any time that the mouse enters the *square* occupied by the image. This is not the ideal effect. Has anyone used javascript along with css image shifting to get the best of both?
I once took a girl home and Googled her when she went to the bathroom.
Reddit's about the same as far as deleting accounts.
ouch.
Continued US presence foments hatred among Iraqis. Hatred of the US and continued poverty leads to religious extremism. al-Qaeda is a religious extremist organisation. Who needs a source to figure that out? It's Terrorstan right now. Announcing a phased pullout along with a dollar figure for reparations would go a long way toward gaining back some of the credibility that the US has lost since Bush was awarded the presidency, not to mention the fact that even a $20B figure for war reparations would save the US taxpayer roughly $180B over the next 2 years.
I have a problem with the use of the word slut in the title. I know some polyamorous (spelling?) people and there is nothing slutty in their approach to sex and relationships.   Though I've also met some people where the word is appropriate.  Anyway, I think a more relaxed attitude towards sex is a good thing. Get away from sex as a taboo.
Down 8% in Three Years!
I don't understand why this comment is being downmodded.  It seems like a very reasonable response to a stream of authoritative assertions of unsupported claims which are not broadly accepted.
i'm a girl and i use reddit. but reddit should know better about the average reddit user female isn't likely to do something because she's told to and it's based on her gender.  but i'm not upvoting either.  :)  and how are trannies/asexuals/hemaphrodites supposed to vote?
Not me.  Allen has done nothing for the state.
&gt;It is possible for a colonial power to dominate countries without importing the people. Of course. The colonialized, however, tend to migrate towards the power and money. Hence France's problems.
Since you mention their business model, just how does Reddit *generate income*, and are there changes ahead?
rhebert, you make me laugh. shiny happy dorky community and why us happy females stick around.
&gt; If Kevin Rose is worth $60 Million Stop right there.
Here's what you do.  Make two lists.  One has all of the classes that don't need to use your singleton.  The other has all the classes that do.  Look at the classes in the second list and think about what they have in common.  Add the missing abstraction to your design. Most people don't do that.  They pass the variable around without thinking or they just make it a global. Either way is lazy.
My vote for the candy.
Legit question, but it won't give a truthful answer because people vote using the mix of karma, hotness, recommendation engine and other reasons.  However, it seems like it gives a nice count of the number of active accounts.
The [GM cryptosystem](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goldwasser-Micali_cryptosystem) is secure even for one-bit messages.  The ability to take advantage of this while still being able to catch cheaters is left as an exercise to the reader.
Well, he could have sung it.
The last part is an accelerated superimposition of all the empires covered in the animation starting with the Kingdom of Egypt.
funny to whom? not me.
&gt; Several What a waste of a post. If you know "several" reasons, let's hear 'em...
You're probably right - houses built into rockfaces tend to remain at a fairly constant temperature. See http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coober_Pedy
This may be the one time where I can really say, "God bless the USA!"
Because the other way around, it'd never become the second highest rated story on reddit ever. Edit: Make that *the* highest rated story ever. http://reddit.com/browse?t=all
So, he went looking for trouble and found it. Now HE wants to play victim? How classicly liberal.
What doesn't make f-in sense?  Testing-and-sanctions makes perfect sense and is pretty damn smart, alternet.org (the site hosting the exit strategy link) also has an article on it: http://www.alternet.org/drugreporter/19934/.  Read Mark Kleiman's explanation if mine sucks too much. As for my legalization comment, I'm just upset at the false dilemma, which I'm sure you can agree with.  Because what is legalization?  Certainly you don't mean "Corn Flakes legal", so that my little nephew can take his lunch money to the store and buy heroin.  Maybe you mean cigarette legal, so there's just an age requirement with minimal other restrictions.  Or maybe you mean a grudgingly tolerant sort of legal, like we have for alcohol, with heavy regulations and restrictions.  Or maybe you mean medicinal, requiring some sort of prescription.  Cocaine is still used in certain medical situations, but you wouldn't call that legal. I agree with you that most currently illicit drugs could use a step or two into the "corn flakes legal" direction.  But I think alcohol needs a step in the other direction.  It causes more societal damage than all other drugs combined.  Things like outlawing tv and print advertisements, increasing funding for education and treatment, and even replacing the age restriction with a new "drinking license" to inhibit problem drinkers could help. The question shouldn't be legalization versus being hard on drugs.  The question ought to be what specific set of policies is best for each particular drug.
That wasn't "Carved", at least not like the ice hotels are. Most of those pictures show that the hotel is made from large rock "bricks" that were added to the side of the mountain.
I think they began restraining him before he began the personal attack on Allen.
I am still using it. I've been moving another site onto it, should I move off it (it slows horribly sometimes)?
Good question.  I always thought my opinion counted as much as the man in my life's did...  And does that affect my preferences, like which articles are automatically "preferred" by me?
That hell house needs a room for the judgemental religious hypocrite.
catch 22
but you can bet they want to keep the IRS out.
i love you makers of photorealistic cg water
remember that reddit "recommends" stuff to you...  this is an advertisers wet dream...  you are constantly telling reddit what you like and don't like...  the advertiser doesn't have to do anything... imagine a situation where the reddit "recommends" page recommends links to you that have advertisements on them that are paying money to reddit...  a nice subtle way of getting money and no-one will ever blame reddit for it...  after all it's only recommending things that you like...
Yeah, but does it raytrace?
"Now ya gettin' personal! Now ya gettin' personal! Now ya gettin' personal!" That guy wasn't a pro bodyguard, cop, or secret service member, and he clearly didn't think even for a *second* that Stark was any sort of a threat. Lucky for him, he was right this time.
Not to mention the copyrighted bits of the human genome.
That wouldn't kill Google. That would kill IE. IE is already a financial burden for Microsoft.
Only men and FBI agents, right?
You can literally watch the garbage collection occur.
A little lit a little vid
The youtube-quality really sucks. check out this quicktime-clip for a better quality preview (the oil rig looks really amazing in this version): http://www.scanlinevfx.com/movie_cutting_edge.html
How can Stark go looking for trouble, find trouble, and then claim he is the victim?
Allen will not be reelected. He might as well just step down now. This kind of amateurishness is par for the course with Allen.
This is exactly the problem with Smalltalk. A Smalltalk image is what DB-heads used to call a "network database."  The term dates from the 1960s and is extremely confusing, because it has nothing to do with what you and I mean by "network."  It just means a web of objects and links with arbitrary graph structure.  Nowadays the word you'd be more likely to hear is "OODB," but it's the same thing. This is obviously the same data structure you maintain in memory when you're coding in a normal imperative language such as Java, Python, etc.  So what's the problem? The problem is that a database is different.  The simplicity bar is lowered considerably, because persistent data has to be administered by humans.  Network databases, OODBs, and other "coredump" databases do not, in general, satisfy this criterion. This is why the good Lord gave us the RDBMS.   Unfortunately, SQL and all its implementations are ugly, full of capital letters, have their own bizarre jargon in which simple ideas are concealed in esoteric bogosity, and in general reek of the early '70s.  But the basic concept of relational algebra are extremely simple and sound. Using a Smalltalk/Squeak image for any important persistent data is, in general, a mistake.  Use Postgres and delete the image.  You will feel a great sigh of relief.
Monads make me afraid of functional languages, mainly because they're never described in a way that makes any sense. Even the spacesuit analogy. I guess I'm just procedural-minded.
Vote it down anyways.
I don't know, it kind of reminds me of my ex. We didn't split up because of our bedtime habits if you know what I mean...
But the test doesn't check whether you're mistaking  celebrities for politicians, it checks whether you  recognize both (with higher scores for politicians). To check what you want, the test should ignore the  absolute score and compare the ratio of known politicians  to known celebrities.  Greater than 1 would be good, close  to 0 would be bad. Personally, I think recognition of faces in general  has nothing to do with politics (unless you're a poltician  and have to *meet* these people).  I treat news as  text-only and often block images altogether.  A test  like this is insulting and has no value. 
I can handle one white rapper on the television and radio but if they're becoming monetairy goods I'm going to shoot some people.
That's what I thought too.  They kind of explain it on the front page. http://www.opendonor.org/
There's also a free mini course via email being offered here.
The criticism that the YouTube acquisition brought?  You can pretty much get a good idea of net criticism by looking at the stock price movement of the one being criticised: Google is way in the red on criticism (and in the black on praise).
Celebrities are actually fairly important in politics, in terms of endorsements and contributions...
Nah, at least they aren't starting wars. Oh wait...
...the pause every quarter turn
I would love to see *Buckley v. Valeo* used as a defense against prostitution. "I wasn't trying to pay her for sex! I was just giving her a political speech!"
Scott obviously didn't do any research before he wrote that piece. I used to think he was smart, but not after this.
I think the Marine would win, not the guy who took the student deferment.
one of the biggest problems i've had with the concept of heaven is that it's gonna be full of jerks that i couldn't stand while i was on earth...  great an eternity with a bunch of idiots and i'll probably have to be nice to them... now hell on the other hand appeals to me...  if i knuckle down and put the hours in there's a good chance that i'll be able to torture the jerks that i couldn't stand on earth for eternity...
Say you want to draw a red triangle over the green one. You could use your method for the background triangle, but if you did the same with the red triangle, your black corners would cover up the green triangle. Obviously you can't just make the black triangles transparent, or you will just end up with a red rectangle. You don't need the triangles themselves to overlap for this to be a problem. Imagine two non-right-angled triangles touching along a diagonal side. Which one do you put on the bottom? Then try it with three or four, for example when you rotate the demo so that one of the arms points directly at you. Then the simplified method won't work, ad you'll have to do something else. Douglas
The ammount of caffeïne in our bodies is an aduaquate replacement for sleep. This way, we can obsessively micromanage our e-cred on a single website that no-one reads outside our special needs group. I love you guys too. :)
Yes, that's nice.  And an O'Reilly login is actually pretty useful... I'm a safari subscriber and it just took a single click to sign back in.  And keeping the scoreboard is very nice.
Using "Nothing" instead of "Null" is legacy from old days, there isn't much you can do about it now without making needless changes. As for IsNot, you have to remember that VB has a more complete set of operators than C#. 1: If A Is B Then  2: If A = B Then  3: if (a == b) The first version does reference equality.  The second version uses value equality if the operator was overloaded. Otherwise it is a compile-time error. The third version is implementation specific. Just looking at it, you cannot tell if reference equality or value equality will be used. One annoying thing about C# is that because of this you cannot add an equality operator overload without breaking compatability. IsNot is simply the pair of Is, just as != is the pair of ==. Neither IsNot nor != is necessary, but they do make the code a little bit cleaner. 
You'll have to try again, competition is getting a bit fiercer!
Haliburton should be seized.
watch the whole thing, it gets WAY better towards the end.
very nice service - tells me I need to de-table and add meta tags to my older sites :)
In Joe's Garage, you is what you are!
Recently I registered with the Canadian embassy in Seoul. They sent me a copy of their basic evacuation plan. The plan outlines the procedures for what Canadian citizens should do in the event of a North Korean invasion or other emergencies requiring the evacuation of Canadians from the Korean peninsula. Includes a link to the full evacuation plan.
"Kiss my imaginary friend's ass or he'll torture you forever."
They can't tell us how important we are :) Good for you guys.  Hope you got rich.  Because you started something that was great, a great idea:  the uncontrollable socially-controlled website.  And now it's been bought.  And you'll be rich, and as free speech becomes more and more stifled here, we'll move on. Bye now.
Photo recognition has zero to do with being informed on politics. Photo recognition of celebrities, even less.
Actually, I'm a bot, and you just lost the Turing Test.  Rock on, this means I really am conscious. Score.
Yes, you're right. Thanks! I was too focused on dealing with a triangle in isolation to see that issue initially.
wow really bad comics
you mean voting?
I like em
Congrats Reddit! 
Congratulations.  The comments on this thread have now proven, unequivocally, that virtually none of you have ever had any kind of meaningful relationship with a woman, ever.  EDIT: ...except for the compassionate few upthread who realise how difficult it is for a 16 year old girl to report rape/relive the memory 20 years on.
Not true. According to this out of date random document I just found: Number of states with disenfrachised voters: For Prisoners: 47  For Probation: 29  For Parole: 32  For Ex-felons: 15 OK, maybe that is most states. I stand corrected. If the link is accurate. Which I have absolutley no reason to believe it is.  http://www.hrw.org/reports98/vote/usvot98o.htm
[In Letter, Allen Tackle Victim Demands Allen Fire Staffers; Pressing Charges Against Allen](http://electioncentral.tpmcafe.com/blog/electioncentral/2006/oct/31/va_sen_in_letter_allen_tackle_victim_demands_allen_fire_staffers) Oct 31, 2006 -- 07:18:48 PM EST
Just watch Season 3 of _The Wire_...
Dude.  Paragraphs.
Of course there's something neurotic about that name, you fucking moron, that's the point.
&gt; if you can identify the majority and minority leaders in both houses by sight, you must know something about them. But the converse isn't true.  They're telling you you shouldn't vote if you get all your news through text and radio.
I don't recall anyone saying this was about religion.  Its about advocating a safer way of living and a way of raising living standards. In the words of Former Clinton advisor William Galston, "you need only do three things in this country to avoid poverty--finish high school, marry before having a child, and marry after the age of 20. Only 8 percent of the families who do this are poor; 79 percent of those who fail to do this are poor." That is based on census data - not some religious organization.  Of course that doesn't matter to people like you though,  "Blah blah, telling me how to live!" "Rah Rah stay out of my bedroom!"  Chances are you are educated, white, and come from a middle class family and are well insulated even if you did make a mistake. Then again I can see the point of you guys.  Who else would you have to ridicule on the Maury Povich if the girl wanting the paternity test to see if one of the 8 guys backstage is her baby's daddy. http://www.census.gov/Press-Release/www/1999/cb99-213.html  http://www.pobronson.com/factbook/pages/417.html
I hear you the latest models have this great new feature.  An *off* switch.
From one of the comments: &gt; [George Allen's] Mom screamed, "Stop, stop, stop!" and held a knife above her head and threatened to kill herself if we didn't stop fighting. (page 77) Doesn't exactly sound like he was raised in a normal household.
Oops, I made a blunder. The last statement of "two birds  in the bush" is probably quite agreeable, but the figures  are not. What I meant is that the bird in hand is the  prospect of earning money as a programmer salary-man for  one and a half years, and  the two birds are betting the farm on hitting is big with  reddit. I forgot to factor in the odds: Above I said 1 : 15  for a startup to succeed. This means we have to multiply  salary-man with 15 (for the odds) and 2 for the  two-birds rule (double for waging something). This means  4 to 5 Mios for each founder, putting a fair compensation  in the range of 20 Mios (making Paul's investment almost  negligible).
I don't recall reading anything in the article that mentioned taking away a person's ability to have an abortion.  Its about  advocating a decision process that will keep you from having an abortion. Do you know anyone thats had an abortion?
Haha! Nice.
234/350: D So I don't know what some of these people look like.  So what?  I don't have a TV or a broadband connection for video.  I'd rather read articles about what's actually happening in the world. And what kind of organization would tell you NOT to vote based on visual appearances?  Doesn't that sound just a _little_ bit Republican?  Or am I just whining?  It smells scummy to me.  Or at least misguided. P.S. Ditto on what cdills said:  Including "I don't know."  promotes low scores.
This doesn't have anything to do with relational vs network models of data. The issue with using Smalltalk-style images (edit: for data) is that it tightly couples the evolution of your code and data. It's more about separating external representation from internal representation, which forces you to deal with issues like versioning. You can use a simple key-value database library like Berkeley DB and still get these benefits.
Have fun in San Francisco! Best city on the planet.
I had the good fortune for a while to work on contract at a government installation that had a small infirmary with cots.  And alarm clocks.  Half my lunch hour was eating, the other half was a nap.
red.di.cul.us
I don't support Sen. Allen at all, but I don't know if I'd call that "beat up".  He was (arguably) being a dick and lobbing accusations disguised as questions, and Allen's goons got overzealous in their removal of him. From what I saw, looked like they were more intent on restraining him than inflicting any harm.  Could be wrong, though.
What about this?  f_ability = lambda do   def f    42  end   end  a = Object.new   a.instance_eval(&amp;f_ability)   a.f  #=&gt; 42  b = a.clone   b.f  #=&gt; 42   def b.f ; 43 ; end   b.f  #=&gt; 43 I tend to use this form (pre-declared methods to add to other objects) but it certainly would be nice to officially be able to "copy" procedures between objects. 
You'd be right except: A majority of Americans support impeachment already. When the Democrats take the House, they get subpoena power. The criminal acts we know about now are what has leaked out despite the rubber-stamp Republican Congress.  And they are *already* enough to justify impeachment. When the American public discovers the extent of the Bush administration's lawlessness, public outrage will force impeachment and criminal investigations.
Funny. Bush hasn't apologized for killing 2700 soldiers. Yet Hannity is demanding that Kerry apologize for insulting the ones still alive? Things are a little skewed, I think.
Check out the comment system they use too - http://www.djangobook.com/comment-help/.
I certainly didn't recognize her, but if she'd had on the ~five pounds of makeup she usually appears in public in, I'd've gotten that one.
[The bug was reported in the Features subreddit.](http://features.reddit.com/info/kn5i/comments)
http://www.virusmyth.net/aids/index/africa.htm I think the largest obstacle to solving the AIDS crisis in Africa are the governments of Africa that help spread, support, and even endorse many of the myths about the HIV virus. Of course though, when the Catholic church operates a free hospital to treat AIDS patients or an orphanage to care for the the unwanted its all so they can spread the policy of no condoms, no abortions, and all that God stuff.
Sweet, I was hoping someone else would catch that before I had to post it ;)
In his first example, I would have floated the `label`s to the left and the `input`s to the right. I agree that there are problems where you need to use `table`s, but I think they're pretty rare as far as it goes.
You're an idiot - what's new?
Overall pretty good, but I think the 'splash' effect needs a bit of work. The water ends up looking 'ropey' when it should in my opinion look more like it has burst into a fine mist. Still, considering how nasty the calculation of fluid dynamics is, I think they've done some amazing work.
Whoa, whoa. Mefi hasn't fallen to a modern-reddit type level. And K5 isn't even bad nowadays if you only read it once a month since the trolls got bored.
I may be an idiot, but at least I'm not an authoritarian bootlicker.
Why didn't reddit ever go the route of crispynews? (but better of course)
If that were true, then 75% of people who make accounts and vote but never submit and never comment are trolls. This is clearly wrong; probably the majority of the voting population is like that, judging by the ratio of votes to comments on the male-female poll.
The most worrying thing about electronic voting is that there is zero records, it's all stored in changeable memory. Paper votes can be rigged, but if it's forced to a recount you can't change what the papers say. If voting machines saved to a form of write-only-memory, which can only be read if you physically pull it out of the machine and stick it into a completely different one that it only works as read-only-memory in. It would likely cost a lot to do, but it would be identical to a paper vote because no one would have a clue what happened to it till afterwards when several million people are closely watching you. I'm not saying it would be totally hack proof, but I'm pretty damn certain someone would be suspicious if a guy walked into the voting booth with a Jaws of Life in his hands.
I did a 3d renderer in javascript 8 months ago. Mine was only wireframe, but it was at least as nice as this. :P
I'm not sure what Wired / Conde Nast had to gain by buying redit, what do you think is their reasoning?
For your own health, never, ever call someone from Quebec French Canadian.  They really hate that.
He would have to write code for that to be possible.
Per person, you mean?
Wow! That's geeky.
You don't see a lot of faces on NPR or ABC Newsradio, but I know the voices -- and the news -- pretty well.
In case you were serious, I meant to keep his belongings safe while he napped.
Scare him? He's charging Allen and his team with assault. And like I said up above, he's a freaking Marine. They don't scare easily, certainly not by balding paunchy necktie thugs.
trolls seldom are..
That's hot ?
For what values of anyone? I'm guessing that I can't get my own subreddit just because I have a domainname.
Not working
They are logging our browser choice and our IP address.
Even the photos of politicians assumes a celebrity-centric view of politics.  Matching people with a paragraph of their writing (or public speech) would be better.  More civilized, too.  
eyeballs
democratic propaganda
1 - Ad revenue 2 - Potential users to be funneled into other services 3 - A useful technical platform for other services 4 - Positive web 2.0 buzz
gossa 
If I were going to be a troll, today would be the day.
Agreed.  Me niether.
Okay, I've got to pee now.
Dude, this is *NOT* a wasteful post and I'm greatful that pickles posted it. Let me tell you! There currently is a problem with drawing piecharts on the web. Because SVG is not universally supported yet, and because you can't rely on people having Flash or Java, you have to draw them server-side as PNG files with extra stuff on Linux, Mac, or Windows to achieve this graphic effect. But imagine if a server-side web algorithm could compute DIV/CSS placement of these triangles such that they could emulate a cross-platform piechart. Now that would really be something. No flash, javascript, SVG, Java, or server-side image manipulation would be necessary -- a server-side PHP, C#.net, or Ruby algorithm could do it all. 
And yet, the balding paunchy guy took him down.  Thanks for playing.
The lesson for me is that high performance is best achieved through a simple, clean design, rather than by high-powered delivery of excessive content.
There are always so many ways that it's mostly search for greater elegance. One more method is to use Proc objects, which can become methods of anything, by define_method(:foo, a_proc). The example assumes Object#singleton_class (RCR 231), and public define_method (no RCR yet, but there should be one):  f_ability = lambda { 42 }   a = Object.new   a.singleton_class.define_method(:f, f_ability)   a.f #=&gt; 42  b = a.clone   b.f #=&gt; 42   def b.f ; 43 ; end   b.f  #=&gt; 43 Of course the real question is - what cool things will be created using such techniques :-)
"In the 2000 election, the City of Philadelphia showed a remarkable 98% voter turnout on what were already bloated voter rolls..." http://samablog.robsama.com/?m=20031212 The alternative to photo ID is to let everybody vote in as many precincts as they care to visit in a single day, but you don't seem to have a problem with that, since you know that anybody with the spare time to do it would be voting Democrat.
Has there ever been a guerilla war or low-level insurgency that has been defeated successfully without resorting to the tactics that Conde_Naste talks about? I ask seriously, not rhetorically, and you seem like you would know.
I got a C+ and live in the UK. Some were just plain impossible to get living outside of the US, because most aren't corrupt enough to make international news. Like the secretary general-designate, how the heck am I supposed to remember his name when all you hear is about how Kofi Annan is suspected of being a crooked bastard and profiting through his son on the food for oil thing. The point scheme is just blatently moronic. Why does the US press secritary get more points than Castro, who gives a fuck about the press secritary if people don't know who Castro is? I mean you've only been at each others throats for 40 years, if people can't tell who he is then invent a god and hope to your new invented hell he's merciful. Why does Limbaugh get you 8 points when Leno, a fellow talk show host, only gets you 1. Also if Madonna is in there, why isn't Angelina Jolie when she's UNHCR's Goodwill Ambassador and attended Refugee Day with Rice and her "She looks prettier than me" face to the cameras.
Maybe there isn't "road rage" in the video, but I sure do hear a lot of car horns.
So you have spent time in the military?  What do you base this perception on?  It was the military that took over the Katrina situation and got things done.   How am I the revisionist?  I think you need a history lesson. http://www.washingtonmonthly.com/features/2005/0509.franklin.html I'm not cheerleading anything concerning FEMA. I'm saying that all of a sudden they are now supposed to be some kind of hands-on emergency response team when they've never demonstrated themselves to be before.  You just don't know what you are talking about.
this is full on.  world grain storages are at 25 year lows and prices are going up fast
I got most of the political figures and missed many of the celebs. My score:  &gt;You should consider not voting until you update your knowledge on contemporary issues. Hmm...so what's the agenda here? I saw ads for this site on TV put out by the AARP. So old people don't want the rest of the country voting. How come? And who's this "Phillip Ferreira" that registered the site?  ---  edit: I've mixed up this site and AARP's dontvote.com
I thought you guys knew he was a Marine.  Whatever happened to *Semper Fi*, do or die? You can't have it both ways.  Either Stark is a Marine and should't have gotten his ass kicked by an old guy, or Stark is an idiot for going in there with a freakin' backpack, talkin' smack.
Ever seen that episode of the Dilbert television series where one of the founding fathers was brought back to life, and then went on to rail against democracy? This is that same schtick. The argument basically boils down to "It's a constitutional republic for a reason."
Thanks for the NSFW warning.
It is completely impossible for a religious meme to survive unless it encourages active evangelism (along with intolerance of competing memes.)
Computational Thinking is a hyped-up buzzword.
thank you 37s for releasing me from the guilt I've been feeling that I haven't put the icons on my blog :) Turns out I was being classy, not lazy!
Well, i'll be altruistic and say "maybe they liked it, and thought it deserved some money?"  It may not be very likely but it's a possibility...
&gt; "The message is 'It's better to wait until you're married to bear or father children,' " Horn said. "The only 100% effective way of getting there is abstinence." Nah.  Abortion is the only 100% effective way.   It sounds like they've never heard of *in vitro fertilization*.  That's what happens when you try to learn biology from the bible.
Submitter: Rush Limbaugh and his ilk are using you.
Definitely powerlaw/long tail.
Yeah, they're pretty stupid.  If you want something you wrote submitted to Reddit, just submit it yourself.  I think almost everyone is okay with that.
That makes two of us.
Where is the $577k number coming from?  A hat?  Assuming you child live in the house for 20 years that would be 25k+ per year, and as one of 8 children I can tell you for certain that my parents are NOT paying $400,000 per year. I live in NY, certainly not one of the cheapest places to live, and I know people with 8 children living on about $60,00 per year (though money is tight at times for them).
Yes, you are an idiot.  If defending a person born in poverty, an African American, during the era of segregation, breaking barrier after barrier all the way to the highest position that any of his community has served in makes me a bootlicker - I wear that badge with honor. I guess we do agree on something. 
Where is 112 coming from? I don't see it in the article . . .
I like the way you think. Honestly. Now back to our regularly scheduled programming. Businesses buy businesses to make money.
Well, thanks for not voting me down. I don't usually go around tooting my own horn, but I thought this was an interesting enough accomplishment of mine that people should know about it. I'm not that desperate for an extra $2.00 of ad revenue. I have another plan for getting rich :)
Yeah, about as much as you fear your mom won't have your favorite bib clean and ready for you to wear during supper time. 
Almost everyone posting so far seems to think the abstinence message is directed at them.  Please remember there are **hordes** of people who should be abstaining from sex, but instead are producing more such people.
That was my point exactly... I'm from Québec and speak French, but am not French!!! I'm Francophone, HUGE difference.
No man, fighting in the ruins of society birthing children along the way
If he defended himself like this in 2004 he might be relevant.  Too bad he didn't, and isn't...
Don't know about the rest of you, but my copy of the "Hell House" documentary is on its way! http://www.amazon.com/Hell-House-George-Ratliff/dp/B000092T6A
But really, how much money can Reddit bring in?  Do you think it can even be a small portion of their other profits?  I'm also curious how reddit brings in money at all.
The wisdom of Limbaugh:  -"Have you ever noticed how all newspaper composite pictures of wanted criminals resemble Jesse Jackson?" -"Feminism was established to allow unattractive women easier access to the mainstream." -"Too many whites are getting away with drug use. The answer is to ... find the ones who are getting away with it, convict them, and send them up the river."--- Limabaugh was arrested for doctor shopping for the pain killer oxycontin LIMBAUGH: "Banks take the risks in issuing student loans and they are entitled to the profits." (Radio show, quoted in FRQ, Summer/93) REALITY: Banks take no risks in issuing student loans, which are federally insured. LIMBAUGH: "Don't let the liberals deceive you into believing that a decade of sustained growth without inflation in America [in the '80s] resulted in a bigger gap between the haves and the have-nots. Figures compiled by the Congressional Budget Office dispel that myth." (Ought to Be, p. 70) REALITY: CBO figures do nothing of the sort. Its numbers for after-tax incomes show that in 1980, the richest fifth of our country had eight times the income of the poorest fifth. By 1989, the ratio was more than 20 to one.  LIMBAUGH: "The poorest people in America are better off than the mainstream families of Europe." (Radio show, quoted in FRQ, Spring/93) REALITY: Huh? The average cash income of the poorest 20 percent of Americans is $5,226; the average cash income of four major European nations--Germany, France, United Kingdom and Italy--is $19,708.  LIMBAUGH: "There's no such thing as an implied contract." (Radio show, quoted in FRQ, Spring/93) REALITY: Every first year law student knows there is.  LIMBAUGH: "It has not been proven that nicotine is addictive, the same with cigarettes causing emphysema [and other diseases]." (Radio show, 4/29/94) REALITY: Nicotine's addictiveness has been reported in medical literature since the turn of the century. Surgeon General C. Everett Koop's 1988 report on nicotine addiction left no doubts on the subject LIMBAUGH: "The worst of all of this is the lie that condoms really protect against AIDS. The condom failure rate can be as high as 20 percent. Would you get on a plane -- or put your children on a plane -- if one of five passengers would be killed on the flight? Well, the statistic holds for condoms, folks." (Ought to Be, p. 135) REALITY: A one in five AIDS risk for condom users? Not true, according to Dr. Joseph Kelaghan, who evaluates contraceptives for the National Institutes of Health. "There is substantive evidence that condoms prevent transmission if used consistently and properly,"   
Don't know if you can generalize that napping continued through the agricultural revolution, except for the occasional unsupervised laborer.  My farming grandmother had this to say about nappers, "Are you sick?  Then get off the bed in the middle of the day!"  Tough lady.
i hope that they discontinue the price is right after he is gone.  the price is right is bob barker.  no one else can do it justice.
&gt;As she skittishly made her way through the hell house, Sydney Foulks, 11, had a vice grip on her father's hand. "I thought it was very scary and I know I'm never sleeping with nobody until I get married," Sydney said as she exited. What the hell could a parent possibly be thinking to put this shit on their child.
No, but someone else made a javascript raytracer. http://www.slimeland.com/raytrace/help.html The code in the background isn't special (as far as raytracing). The unique part is that it displays the results by making a bunch of 1px by 1px colored DIVs to render the image in a web browser without involving any server-side processing.
they were just too busy decripting the check mark on people's t-shirts..
i was amazed by water in half life 2 and how long this can be put in games?
Hey, how about spending that money on armor for our troops and repairs for their vehicles you fucking assholes!!!!!!
So am I :)
What future
You both missing the point, this isn't about storing data, it's about storing your code.  Smalltalkers still use databases for persistent data, but our code lives in the image, not a bunch of text files.  Do you store your Java or C# in a relational database?  No? I didn't think so.   The image isn't a problem with Smalltalk, it's an advantage Smalltalk has over file based languages.
a few thoughts: 1) userbase that doubles monthly is worth money. think google when it was a search engine before ads. once the ads went in, big $. if userbase continues to double, the profit margins get very attractive very quick. Think of it this way - What's their "cost" per eyeball vs. "revenue opp" per eyeball. The cost is very, very close to $0.00, and getting closer. 2) reddit functionality rocks, if they can integrate it with their other web properties, it makes them stickier. 3) the team that built and operate reddit (a fast-rising, simple, fast, web2 site) are worth a lot to have on your team.
What a horrible syntax. It makes cobol almost look terse.
That's what spammers say, too.
I've always thought that one was fine, and two was a crowd. Pick your favorite and put it somewhere unobtrusive that blends in. People that are going to submit your story are going to try hard anyways and if you make it just a little easier they'll find it.
I agree.  The issue isn't morality, it's the rising number of young single mothers.
have you bothered to watch the video footage?
What was the highest rated story ever?
A smart one who wants it to be obvious who was responsible for the violence come his day in court?
Artis, great points, couldn't agree more with how copyright holders are taking advantage of the situation while not acknowledging the need to radically change their business model. You might want to check this article and discussion at Wired:  http://blog.wired.com/music/2006/10/gracenote_helpi.html
  whoosh.
Agreed. Congrats. I hope the reddit guys will share their next cool idea for us to enjoy.
PlumbingGoods.com is an online leader in PEX Plumbing, general plumbing supplies, Radiant Heat Products, heating supplies, and more. Plumbinggoods.com is among the trendsetters who are one of the kinds to provide exclusive information needed to purchase right product with a list of popular companies to offer you guarantee products. It is the best and most popular websites to provide with the best information and quality products for your home or office. The website provides the best information in the plumbing goods available in the market. Not only, the information found here is reliable but the products available are assured of top quality in best prices. 
what wasn't safe for work?
Informed debate over religion? Are you high? The atheists will supply facts and logic, and those of various religious persuasions will offer up their bible/koran/reader's digest as opposing proof. Nobody's gonna be persuaded, so I might as well enjoy myself.
Am I allowed to upvote his articles to counteract this?
Works pretty simply, and you just need a small converter for it.
That would probably screw with their database. Why bother deleting the account when you could have some disabling mechanism instead?
Up to a point, overdoing it causes reflexive downmodding.
pretty sweet huh?
It seems possible that he was kidding. But he should have known better.  It's surprising how much stuff people say over the internet can hurt emotionally.   Like one time I posted this thread 'Who Cares about Homecoming' in my high school's message board, and some guy indirectly told me to commit suicide.  It sucked for about half an hour.
the point of a debate is not to persuade...  and it's very easy to have an informed debate about religion...  it all depends upon what you are debating...
Someone who can't do better than having his 'guys' throw a heckler out doesn't deserve to be Senator.
&gt;You can't have it both ways. Good golly, you're unglued.
I'm so impressed by this. First star of rap to do it. Others will likely follow.
George Steinbrenner, owner of the New York Yankees, fell ill over the weekend while he was watching his granddaughter performed in play on the University of Carolina campus. Read more at www.mjock.com/page
cool
This is pointless for firefox users who have the VideoDownloader extension.  Now, a site that automatically converts the youtube flv video to, say, an mpeg2 would be much more effective.
I think that's the dumbest thing they could do.  They get all of this free publicity from this news and what do they do?  They turn off their service.  How many potential new users have they lost?  100's, 1000's?
It's about time 37 Signals STFU.
i really like the UI design on the homepage
I would give this a big UP, except there's no software! We can't download it! WTF!
&gt;Even die-hard Republicans have to be thinking False.
He is a protester. His website:  http://www.callingallwingnuts.com/  If he wants to be a 'journalist' he needs to not call those he questions names.
Just dive in.  It's a deep pool, and you'll be flailing for a couple of weeks quite likely, but just do it.  While I was learning, monads sort of scared me.  The (&gt;&gt;=) operator set my pulse racing, and I was ready to throw the mouse at the monitor and run, in hopes that (&gt;&gt;=) would fall for the diversion.  But eventually, as things like the type system started to make sense, monads indeed became ["warm fuzzy things"](http://www.updike.org/~jared/index.cgi?learning) and (&gt;&gt;=) became my friend. For help along the way, #haskell on freenode is great.  So long as you make an effort, people there will help you out.   Edit: I should qualify that... the continuation monad still scares me.
nice
Nascar'ed up; i like that phrase
hmm, it was actually in the NY Times article
Is it possible to get pregnant or get an STD if you are abstinent?
If they like the poll, they downvote. If they don't like the poll, what then?
I know that the article talks about using an image for storing code, but I was responding specifically to mencius's objections to using snapshot images as a form of persistent data store.
Why don't you get some earplugs and sleep in your car with the doors locked?
Sold!
Doubt they are moving
This is done on rendering clusters in the thousands-of-processors range. A real-time version would require a completely different algorithm, probably starting from scratch, to be viable on today's (or five-years-from-now's) machines. Remember the claims that the PS2 could render Toy Story in real time? That's still impossible with today's computers. We'll have to be past that point before we can even think about this.
I think it's a pretty normal form of architecture in some areas of Turkey.  I think they're formed partly by "digging" and partly by building.  I have some friends who lived in Turkey for a while and that's what I understood. However, "normal forms of architecture" is in no way meant to contradict the basic fact that this is quite a kick-ass hotel.  ;o)
DD
So, does this mean we'll get Google wikis? Integrated with Blogger and Google Pages, perhaps? Manna from heaven, if this be.
this is good news. now the reddit guys will suffer corporatia  in return for the enormous amount of time I have spent clicking and clicking and clicking after  I discovered reddit. A free info sources goes under corporate control. A sad day for Anarchy   
If you submit fast enough to be accused of overdoing it, it probably means what you're writing is crap anyway.  If what you write is actually good, nobody will mind.
As to the bullshit scoring: I don't know. That's what I was trying to point out. I've got no sympathy for you on the secretary-general designate, though. The UN is an international organization that gets nearly zero attention in the US. I learned about the guy through a [British publication](http://economist.com/index.html). I'd say that's one you should have known.
How many Serbians did 'we' kill?
Sounds like one of those lame curses uttered in Harry Potter movies!
But most design patterns don't let you do cool things like write CPS transforms as a library.
that's because they *don't* make any sense. like 'design patterns' -- there's no way you could rephrase something inherently meaningless and useless to make it make sense. 
Since you use VB, C# and Java, you're automatically disqualified from any discussion on good syntax.
People don't use Smalltalk images to store data.
I don't have time to reconstruct the justification for our intervention in all its complexity now. Here's a brief summary: We took lives to save lives, and did so in a very reasonable ratio. Morever, Srebenitsa demonstrated powerfully the effect of a pullout - we knew how many lives we would save by intervening. If you're interested, take a class on humanitarian wars at your local political science department.
I agree that Ruby's performance should improve, but keep it away from the "Enterprise". Let the idiots use Java.
Transexuals and neuters may use the 'hide' button.
&gt;Srebenitsa demonstrated powerfully the effect of a pullout Exactly the reason we cannot precipitously withdraw from Iraq.
Really depends on if you define sex as starting at the moment of penetration, and ceasing alongside said.
I am troubled by a statement in this article: "The drug war kicked off by President Nixon in the 1970s, and copied by state and local governments nationally" The reason for my being troubled is that this statement seems somewhat misleading to me - it leaves the reader with the impression that the American "war on drugs" is a relatively recent phenomenon that has existed for merely a few decades. This is indeed far from the truth.  America has been fighting its insane "war on drugs" for more than a century: http://www.drugsense.org/dpfca/DrugWarCentennial1.htm Think about that point for a moment, if you please... more than a century of repressive attitude and actions, with almost no positive results.  What has been the total cost of this failed effort?  Was it all truly worthwhile? I do not believe it has been worthwhile at all.  It has cost staggering amounts of money, ruined lives and reputations, engendered rampant crime and corruption, and has forever tarnished the perceived reputation of America as being a "pro-choice, pro-freedom" sort of nation. Indeed; the sole positive result of the "war on drugs" that I am aware of - if one could actually view the result as *being* "positive" - has been the considerable boost in both the numbers of police staff and in the budgets that fund them. Could this have any connection at all with why this so-called "war" still exists in law and in practice?
This is Web 2.0. A product does not have to be useful, working, or even exist in order to be The Next Big Thing. I mean look at these guys -- they make a web site (Web 2.0 compliant no less), write some cheesy bios, and hey, they even have a "blog"! Who cares if there won't ever be any code, this is acquisition potential and IPO material right here.
Are those shark scenes from "[Meg](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0450459/)"?
Good article. I've never been much of a napper myself, as I just can't get used to it, but I appreciate the desire for a slower paced life. One point though: If you live in a city where someone can successfully charge $14 for a place to nap, then you live in an evil and unhealthy place.
Isn't this just done with particle systems? If so, a game doesn't require a different algorithm at all. Same thing, less particles (probably a few orders of magnitude fewer, but we'll get there).
Poetry, chat and international terminal
It's the first working model of a user directed news service with a pluggable karma rating system for comments.  It's slashdot without the mess, and you can one off it for every other site on the planet. Why wouldn't you want to buy it?
scott adams can put this in his pipe and smoke it
"What if she somehow DID manage to get him locked up for a few years? Like that would stop him once he got out..." She can't. Without evidence, it's her word against him, and going against him in court would be like him raping her all over again. Especially in a case of word-against-word.
It could not read my mind.. Haha
"All four reddit employees" lol and, boo hoo There goes another load of techies to the west coast  
You only really need to worry about them if you want to handle interaction, streaming IO or somesuch. If you can couch your problem in terms of batch processing - all inputs are available at the start and the output can be build up and then presented in whole when complete you can forget about them. A surprising number of problems can be couched in these terms, but you'll find yourself using another language/technology to handle the batching process itself. Not that there's anything wrong with that of course.
This kind of work has been done for several years in the academic literature. I implemented one such algorithm, actually, for a final project in a graphics course. It has been around mostly since 2001, with improvements (e.g. a new algorithm allows you to track colors on the surface) recently. This video is probably just those algorithms run on clusters. [Here](http://www.cs.berkeley.edu/b-cam/Papers/Bargteil-2006-ASL/) is one pair of movies on this topic; the movies were generated, IIRC, on reasonably powerful PCs, but single PCs nonetheless. That shows you what you can do with just PCs; it seems logical that if you had access to a cluster, you could do what is in the movie here.  As for the ropey quality of the splashes where there should be mist, the basic problem is that these simulations are done on big 3D grids representing where the water is and isn't. The velocity field is represented at each point on the grid, and the Navier-Stokes equations (equations describing the change in velocity in a fluid over time) are solved numerically given the velocities on the grid. Now, this is all fine and good for normal water movement, but when you come along to a splash and you want mist, it's very difficult because mist is a very tiny phenomenon, much smaller than the resolution of the grid. There has been some work (http://www.graphics.stanford.edu/~fedkiw/ and text search for octree) done on making the grid be finer where it needs to be and coarser elsewhere, but this doesn't get you down to the level of mist.  Mist could probably be done by a hack, e.g. making mist-looking smoke when certain splash conditions are met, but it probably wouldn't be up to the quality of this video without major time-consuming tweaking, and anyway most people don't notice the lack of mist.
&gt;These guys are amateurs with poor impulse control, acting out their fantasies of impotent rage. (...) Are you implying that he looked like a suicide bomber? If so, could you explain how tackling him would have been the correct thing to do? 1. You obviously contradicted yourself; they *arn't* Secret Service, they're staff members/bodyguards. I don't know what they should do if he was a suicide bomber, and I doubt you do either. [Shoot him](http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/8655541/)?  2. How does a backpack immediately equate to a suicide bomber? I can think of a lot of other dangerous stuff you could put in a backpack...
"All expressions are method calls with blocks"  Pros: Clean syntax.  Cons: Assembler people have a brainfart. There is a generation of programmers who have been growing up alongside programming, but doing so very slowly. They started with assembler, then came to C after years of resistance. Then C++, and then Java. Some of them then followed on to Python, others passed by it and came to Ruby. The next stop is Smalltalk (or a nice, &lt;5 character rehashing). LISP, especially the LISP with reader macros, is still very far away. We still have more sign posts to add, though. We've yet to touch non-imperative (in the English grammar sense of the word) programming, which requires an A.I. compiler. There's no famous genetic programming language yet. And don't forget non-symbolic programming. We've a way to go.
... and more money in lawyers' pockets is the worst crime of all. What a broken system we have, all around.
I've never been raped, but I'm the type of person who doesn't report things simply because I'm terrified of being told that it's my fault. I currently have a cut in an unmentionable place, no idea how I got it (I'm not sexually active), and I'm not going to see a doctor about it, because I'm afraid it's all my fault, and that it'll be blatantly obvious that it's all my fault. If I were raped? I wouldn't report it. I'd be embarrassed, I'd feel guilty, I'd be a victim (because that's what rape *does* to women, it makes us victims).  Some people (women as well) believe that we let ourselves be victims, but I personally don't believe that. Even if you just get mad and get even and the guy goes to jail, what happens to you next? You're still a victim. What happens in your life after you send the rapist to jail? Do you just go on as if nothing happened? Sending a rapist to jail doesn't make everything "all right" again. Rape changes you, and you can't ever go back. Personally, I'd react the same way that woman did. I'd be in a stupor, dazed and not comprehending what was going on. Later on, I'd tell people my story, but I wouldn't go and report the guy. Why bother? It doesn't make everything right again, and I'd probably have been in the stupor for so long that it's just his word against mine, and I'd rather not submit myself to that.
And she could very well find herself accused of slander.
No, it isn't always done with particle systems. One approach (the particle-levelset method) incorporates particles, but it also requires a high-order conservation law solver. In any case, that approach looks like shit with fewer particles. Other approaches (semi-lagrangian contouring) just use a 3D grid, but coarsening the grid to the point where it would be doable in real time would make it look worse than current real-time stuff. These algorithms even on very small grids generally take several hours on a standard PC to produce a couple seconds of animation.
Yea, my bad, he missed the point.
That's what AOL told Winamp, and Yahoo! told del.icio.us.
I haven't thought it through fully, but I suspect you could have a good crack at it by using the Z depth - much like a painters algorithm.
A guide to using RSS feeds to help you with your holiday shopping including a list of RSS friendly shopping sites.
LMAO, that's so true!
One of the commenters in the 37S thread makes the very good point that most people don't know about Digg, Reddit and others, never mind how to submit. The little icons provoke a "What's that?" response in some of these people. And it's amusing that the 37s RSS feed has links to post in it... Oops.
Chuck Norris took the same 22 tests and passed them, and also killed a terrorist while doing so.
WEB 2.0 IN FULL EFFECT
I can swear I've heard of companies using an image-based approach to deployment of their software, and I can probably dig up the stories given a little time. In any case the issues here tend to come up whenever you have a system for transparent persistent storage of data. The issue is that you aren't forced to maintain separate  representations of data for internal use (what the application code accesses) and external use (what lives on the file system). Having a single representation (as in transparent persistence ala images, Gemstone, or E) can save time and work up front but has all kinds of negative implications as the application evolves.
who cares if it's a blogger   
what else that is interesting is that the purity and availability is are all rising and more and more money is being wasted putting people behind bar that simply had possession not even intent to sell. Lets just hope Nevada votes it legal, then they can tax it to death. The real hippies will just grow it at home, harming _NO ONE_ it is a victim less crime.
The 90's were so bad that the invasion was actually a turning point and chance for hope: &gt;[According to economic studies carried out in the late nineties, Iraq's real gross domestic product (GDP), i.e. Iraq's GDP adjusted for inflation, fell by 75 percent during 1991-1999. The results of these studies showed that Iraq's GDP in the late 1990's was estimated at approximately the country's real GDP in the 1940's, before the oil boom the process of the modernization of Iraq. The per capita income and the peoples' calorie intake decreased to a level as low as that of one of the desperately poor so called "Fourth World" states such as the Democratic Republic of Congo, Rwanda Haiti and Somalia.  Other Economic studies and reports showed that almost all aspects of the Iraqi economy have been severely devastated since the end of the Gulf War in 1991. Its basic social and economic infrastructure as well as its valuable assets have been either eroded or irrecoverably destroyed. Iraq's educated elite and highly qualified cadres have fled the county; the value of the national currency, the Iraqi dinar, has been in constant and continuous decline. Inflation, which was 1000% in 1993, has been skyrocketing due to the government printing money to finance its spending commitments by printing money.](  http://www.arab.net/iraq/iq_economy.htm) 
"178 billion barrels in Canada" Ah.  That may explain why Cheney visited Fort MacMurray.
I refuse to "let you tell me"  I have never heard "White America" before this Ad. There is simply more people America, more people to be racist bigots more people to make us all look back. Just because you have never heard "White Canada" doesn't mean no one has said it. I think we all know how this Ad is or isnt racest, we dont need you to tell us.
Holy crap and then another holy crap.
I think there is a bigger question here. Why should people need to be concerned about whatever a site like reddit collects about them? My understanding is that US people have a constitutionally guaranteed right to free speech? Oh - sorry about that.
They (black universities) were created because there was a very large and apparent gap still in society after slavery was abolished. They were created to help the black people that were still under raceism to rise up. BET is actually pretty raciest, but Black to white raceism is a very big problem, and its almost also used in a comedic sense.
Because of America's history White people being raceist is a very hurtfull and sensitive topic, but other races are not seen this way nearly as much.
Race and sex are to very diffrent things. The gender of a person could easily effect what people like, while the race of someone only changes the color of your skin. Maybe what you are thinking of is how someone is brought up. A sterotype is that white people are brought up in nice neighborhoods and black people are brought up in the hood ect.  Now targeting people with high income and a high level education instead of low income and low level of education is ok, but targeting people of different races only is not. Go back to school, or stay in there for a bit longer.
Alchemy gave rise to chemistry to an extent and I do recognize some great work is being done in the study of the mind, but there seem to be too many dimestore philosophers muddying the waters.  Some have found that their philosophizing (shallow as it is) gets more of an audience and $ when they claim to be part of cog. sci. instead of just declaring that they're spouting off their opinions.  There's certainly a use for genuine philosophers to help fix the terms so that a productive nomeclature may take hold (this was crucial in the transition from alchemy to chemistry--Lavosier and the naming of oxygen and compounds based on constiuent parts...), but so much time is being wasted with debates that could have taken place (and did) in Descartes' day.  Descartes was a genius but was wrong about plenty.  I have a midterm Thursday and need to read several hundred pages (make that skim as I consider how much that will suck) otherwise I'd take the time to develop this further and provide you with some links.  My basic point is that just as Newton and Einstein both realized that you can only explain gravity to a certain extent, so cognitive scientists will have to realize that fruit will come not from trying to explain consciousness or what makes humans unique but by describing what takes place and trying to derive mathematical representations and rules that coincide with mental processes.
I would disagree that purity and availability are rising.  While "recreational" substances remain illegal, purity has always been suspect: http://www.ecstasydata.org/ As well as the persistent rumours of strychnine-laced LSD (false), cannabis sprayed wiith heroin (in aqueous solution; possible), et al. Availability, on the other hand, has in my experience remained reasonably constant.  I find cannabis as easy to obtain now as I did more than thirty years ago.
A million dollars doesn't mean you can stop working. One day you'll finish prep school and this will become clear.
This will not happen (for odvious reasons)  and this is really old
i agree, but not all users got firefox. :(
Sorry about that, yeah it looked pretty bad. It should be fixed now. Sadly I still have a long way to go with HTML.
Wow, way to back it up with some evidence. "we haven't used them and we do great !=&gt; they must be useless!" hm
funny
iam absoltely furious about the ABC axing the Glass House because i always thought that program was fun to watch especially corrine grant i thought she was really cute and funny 
A good article - they mention the limitations of pattern matching in the human mind, which leads me to my point:  Most people's minds work by using pattern matching to disregard information viewed. Thus, repetitive information tends to get ignored - and that's a problem when you're trying to find the needle in the haystack of travel bags!  But, there are people whose mind doesn't work that way - autistics. People with autism don't seem to have the same 'pattern-match and disregard' way of thinking that most of us do. Therefore, they really can look at that kind of stuff all day long and still be able to pick out the bomb.  Why has nobody done anything about this?
so when's web2.0 gonna burst already then? let's see some web v3 going on..
Uhh, I'd rather have Bono keep his money and let him give it to charity than have the government take it, keep most of it, and then give a marginal amount to charity.
"one liberal-minded bar association way out in washington" Really?  I did not receive such an impression, from reading this passage in the article: "The King County Bar in fact assembled a nationally unprecedented coalition of supporters, ranging from the Washington State Bar Association to the King County and Washington state medical associations, the Church Council of Greater Seattle and the League of Women Voters of Seattle and Washington." What is your reasoning, in reducing the above to mean "one liberal-minded bar association way out in washington"?
[Cisco  Security Bulletin](http://tools.cisco.com/MySDN/Intelligence/viewThreat.x?threatId=5222) which mentions that this is being actively exploited in the wild.
I got 350 out of 350. I better not see any of you lesser beings at the polls. But if you must vote, vote for me.
talk about being completely random
Technologies such as RSS, tags, SMO, social bookmarking, etc., are ineffective if you don’t have a grasp on what they are, how they work and how you can benefit from them.  
Unbeknownst to them, their haunted house is actually inside an even bigger haunted house for atheists.
George Allen is a monster.  He belongs in jail, not the Senate of the United States of America.
Does anyone else find it disturbing that more people were able to correctly identify Jay Leno than the President?
Downed for lambda ignorance
Freedom of press in America currently ranks 53rd.  44th was last year and in 2004 it ranked 22nd. (Source: http://tinyurl.com/y7a9z3)
The problem is that ATMs and voting machines have nothing in common besides that they are computers. ATMs are simple they count how much you have left in your account and identify you  with two-factor authentication. Voting machines on the other hand don't identify you at all and don't have any records on you, they count what you voted for (or not) and if you are lucky they print a piece of paper that no one will probably ever use (otherwise you could just do paper voting and skip the whole machine part). 
こっちがRubyConf2006のkeynoteですよー。
I also got a perfect score.  We should be running mates.  We should work to make this test law so that we don't have to worry about losing the votes of all those who posted comments here.
Does anyone know if we can also simulate fire, and explosions  this realistic? and what software does that?
Excellent a corporate buy... I wonder how long until the site gets censored and certain snips will not appear; depending on which poli-sci views the BOD's favor.
I was in this hotel. There is cold and damp. But I have more good emotions :)
I definitely disagree with this website's stated goals and the way the test is set up, but it is very true that most people know very little about political issues.  A better test would ask people to identify the Senators, Representatives, and others who represent them by name, not necessarily by sight.  I don't think many people would be able to do this, let alone be able to say how their representatives voted on important issues.
this is my f*@ked-up comment.    please save my intrenets.   
I haven't had many productive discussions about race with people who subscribe to that kind of viewpoint. I'd honestly prefer it if they segregated themselves on sites like the one advertised, instead of invading Reddit. Not that I don't respect their right to share their views, of course. It's just that I don't really want to deal with them.
Very impressive but it still has that plastic-y CGI look.
I scored a 341/350, but I can honestly say I would have failed without *Daily Show* torrents. Most print news items lack pictures of all the participants. Not getting your news through television definitely hampers your ability to do well on this test.
Do you mean something like this?  my_func(  :something =&gt; lambda { do_stuff },  :otherthing =&gt; lambda { other_stuff }   ) As a means of passing more than one block to a method, its quite ugly IMO.
Shouldn't it mirror the elephant?
There's an element of truth to what you say.  But there are also those of us who have evaluated Smalltalk since many years ago.  I still choose Ruby over Smalltalk.  I know Ruby borrows many concepts from Smalltalk, but I want Ruby, not Smalltalk!  But yes, Ruby hasn't yet "arrived", in a sense.  But Smalltalk hasn't either.
[Make Bono History](http://www.shotdeadinthehead.com/products/info.php?products_id=76)
Wahh... After years of being called a traitor for questioning Bush's positions and being told that if you're not with the administration you're for the terrorists I could care less what this sack of shit thinks of me.
Sometimes they [survive](http://www.google.com/search?q=failed+abortion).  Abstinence is the only 100% effective way.
I wonder how much Ireland was taxing them?  I think this should be included in the report.
I'd say more like $2-3 million in all. I don't think the reddit guys are greedy, and I think they want to see how far they can take the site. Some of the money they get is most likely based on performance.
&gt; interface: interactive surface. the rest is logics: [Interface](http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=interface)  &gt; 1.\ta surface regarded as the common boundary of two bodies, spaces, or phases. That's the one I was referring to. &gt; 3.\ta common boundary or interconnection between systems, equipment, concepts, or human beings. That's the one informationarchitect was referring to. &gt; interface: interactive surface. That's just some weird folk-etymology you pulled out of your interface.  If you're a native speaker, you should be ashamed.  And not just a native speaker of English, but of any language! ;-) Informationarchitect: 1, foonly: 1, neno: -2 
this site contains excellent information about what is mesothelioma, mesothelioma lawyer, and peritoneal mesothelioma
What a crappy hatchet job.
If you voted this stupid "test" up, then YOU probably shouldn't be voting. But, hey, America is run by idiots, so why shouldn't you have your say?
i am doing a local project . for that i need some reports.  i think these are easy in crystal report format.  please send me some example crystal reports.    in my system when i am doing crystal reports the field explorer or toggle field view is disabling. it is uneasy to do parameterized reports.   please send some sample parameterized crystal reports . and how many ways to create parameterized crystal reports.  please send me sample reports for each catageory.    advanced thanks   
That won't work either. You are not uninformed about politics because you know about celebrities. You might be uninformed if you cannot recognize the politicians.
How can we know if it is true ?
Maybe because nobody's actually intending to vote for Republicans this year? :)
The reason I like and use Ruby for pleasure and work, has nothing to do with the interpreter implementation.   It stinks, and I still like Ruby.  In that regard, the slow rate of progress towards a JIT precompiler is annoying but certainly not a show-stopper. As an ex C and ASM guy, I'd love to have the luxury of time to have a crack at making Ruby faster.  But I have better things to do with my time :-)
... and that's your evidence that this policy has been "so successful"? Definitely ironic, but I still can't tell if it's intentional?
Ugly, but possible, and not commonly used
The problem with this test is that those of us who primarily read newspapers and hear radio rather than watching TV for news don't know some of the appearances of some politicians, but we probably know more about their policies.
Makes me like Bill G even more. Talks less, donated more.
Good point, I can't think of any other case either though :)
If users find them useful, what is the harm in having those icons?  I thought Web 2.0 is all about user-centric designs.  Yes, some icons are too cluttered, but at least having the reddit, digg, and delicious icons are essential.
So many new cars daily during SEMA 2006 - check out the tag SEMA and see all the cars - also forums on the hottest new cars of SEMA and many blogs including the new GM EcoJet Concept
Note that this is because of the long history of people who profess "white pride" to murder people who aren't white...  Besides, read up on the "national vanguard".  They're neo-Nazis.
I agree, but then why is Digg more popular?
Yes, and "don't know" earns you no points, even for actors.
I'd still prefer a bedroom with windows.
What I like most about it is that it's not cute. It's somewhat badass.
New Business with virtual technology on internet. People can buy anything or sell anything only on internet
It's a shame that he didn't try addressing how Myspace skews how people interact and make friends, or how it fosters elitism.
What, the 9/11 Comission Report isn't enough of an "investigation" for you? Look, I admit, it's hard for me to keep the crazies separate from the skeptics.  It's true that there are still things (some things, whatever) that we don't know about Pearl Harbor... Wait, I meant 9/11...  Because obviously both were grand conspiracies to get the nation into war mode. Give it a couple of decades and any remaining files around 9/11 will be declassified - if there are any.  Or do you still think that there was a second shooter in the Kennedy assassination?
I agree, those buttons just seem desperate. "Make me popular, please!"
I'm probably mixing things up, but what I'm referring to are the prepaid calling cards on which you deposit money at a network's kiosk and then use to make calls.  This is the cellphone payment method popular in Europe that's marginzalized in the US (in favor of monthly bills).
It's very original idea!  May be many tourists come in this hotel
Get a room!
Because I'm obviously chasing after a sociology degree in my skepticism that porn somehow reduces sex crimes.  Might as well say that violent media lessens the chance of violent crime rather then, in some cases, inspiring it. Also, I'm digging the downvoting I'm getting as soon as I redraft the story submitter's analogy to kids for kicks and to show how stupid I feel it is.
Seriously do you care that much? That's sad.
37 Signals bloggled about It’s the content, not the icons. I disagree with them. I think that the Icons that people put under their blogposts help their unknow blogs to spread the word.
it's illegal, according to moonbats, but is it immoral? Weren't we justified to invade Germany? Or Kuwait, or Somalia?
The nasty bit is that this systems make voting a privilege which the government grants you at their own discretion. Is that how it's supposed to be? It can also be easily used to criminalize large segments of the population, and so disenfranchise them. I think this is a major reason why small-scale marijuana users are so agressively targeted in the US.  (It's not the reason why marijuana is illegal, however. It's illegal almost everywhere, and the reason is the huge negative externalitites of drug abuse. Prudent nations realize they can't afford another alcohol.)
Sometimes, trolling is really appropriate. One thing is for certain: there is no stopping them; the ants will soon be here. And I for one welcome our new corporate overlords. I'd like to remind them that as a trusted TV personality, I can be helpful in rounding up others to toil in their underground sugar caves.
I am just wondering where can I share alternative contents in reddit and I went to nsfw.reddit.com and discovered it was discontinued. What a shame! So how do you guys feel? Should we always hide the subconscious of our mind?
What does this have to do with Iraq? We were talking about Sudan. You confuse and anger me.
Congrats Reddit, you deserve it
And you can add your own! Submit now and you could win $100, a year's subscription to JPG Magazine, and a Lensbaby!
Too much swearing for making it a classic but it's good to read anyway :)
those terms are mutually exclusive. 
2. They must not understand the point then. I assume reddit's user base will actually flee elsewhere rather than being funneled in one mash up service. Well that's the feeling I have anyway.
Right, because we all know that the government does only evil things with the money it "keeps"... horrible, unmentionable things like building infrastructure, paying government employees, and **GASP** improving national defense. THE HORROR!
Yeah yeah yeah. Conservative vs Liberal. The author is trapped in simple minded, dualistic, and infantile thinking. From the article:  &gt;A conservative would argue that's because in this country, we don't begrudge a man the opportunity to keep what he earns off the sweat of his brow Riigghhht. So all "liberals" have give all their money to the government... And they also have to be pro-choice and pro-gun-control just because they are "liberals"? And all "conservatives" have stand for lower taxes and smaller government (as if) just because they are "conservatives"? This is silly. Bono is Bono, neither liberal nor conservative, just plain Bono. Maybe he wants to decide how to deploy his money most efficiently rather than leaving it to the government; maybe he just want to have more money for himself, either way it is his decision.
In secret deals like this, do the Reddit guys manage to maintain some kind of equity in themselves? or just stock in the parent corporation?
I don't believe it would - it'd obscure the other adjacent triangles. Nice catch though.
Link to the exhibition website below. http://www.reinventingthebikeshed.com/
Linkjack.
This is the quintessential clever hack - extracting the last bit of juice out of a platform. A big thumbs-up to the guys.
Please take your spam somewhere else. Jesus.  At least if you're going to spam reddit with something, make it something better than a half-assed, crappy website that just copies the marketing materials directly from the manufacturer.  Crap. And you might want to ease up!! On the use! of ex!cla!mation points!!!!!!!
The question isn't whether the government does any good with its money, but whether it does so more efficiently than private charities that Bono might give his money too.
very objective
I think the GOP should focus on kicking Halliburton in the nuts before it goes splurging about tax cuts. :(
"If you've reached the age of 25 without having lost your virginity, you don't exactly need lessons in how not to have sex.  You're probably an expert at it." --from the poster known as "Marx and Lenin"  at Steve Gilliard's News Blog 
Exactly!
Why 25 divided by 5 really is 14
No opinions?
No more NSFW? That's me gone, then... Good luck to the rest of you!
Fastererfox is a tweaked version of Fasterfox that allows you to improve your surfing speeds even faster (especially to regularly visited sites) with some new features, contained in a new Tab called “Thrash” which you can find in the options settings.
google will just take wired instead mwuhahahahaha
You'll be caring when our bombs start searing the flesh of your loved ones. Good to know though that America doesn't have a monopoly on idiots.  I sometimes forget that.
What designer in his right mind would develop something that 80% of the target audience can't use?
Why is this getting modded down?
I meant that vanguard should focus on white poor if only because people tend to be more attuned to shortcomings of their community and how specifically financial and emotional support nets should be tailored. Any help is good, but coming from a different ethnicity or race is probably going to embarrass me further and look like a hand-me-down
No, you just are not getting my point. There is no need to pass a law that declares an entire treaty invalid.  Once it becomes a part of the US legal code a treaty is not a complete and inviolate block of text.  It is just a collection of laws and standards of practice which are a part of "the law of the land" until such time as the legislature changes them. It is possible to pass a law which declares an entire collection of previous law to be null and void, which appears to be what you think did not happen.  From this particular viewpoint you are correct, no law or resolution was passed which declared any treaty or other collection of law invalid. Another way that laws get changed is when a new law is passed which re-writes the text of the old law, declares certain portions of the old laws to no longer be valid, or just ignores the existence of the old law and declares a new set of laws with no regard for what may or may not have already been writen. The latter is what happened.  It was not necessary to pass a law declaring an entire treaty or other agreement to be invalid, all the legislature needed to do was say "the CINC has our permission to go beat up on this country" and for the executive to use the authority granted is not breaking the law.  The particular form of chicken-shit authorization that was granted is unfortunate, but seems to be something of a compromise between a deep ambivalence towards actually declaring war and the fear that GWB might actually have been telling the truth.  In hindsight it is easy to see where the process broke down and how it was manipulated, but at the time it was not quite as clear. Tell you what, if you are so convinced that criminal acts were committed, please cite the specific US laws that were broken...
wow, monads made even more useless than before. 
On the first day I went to university there was a big party organized by people selected by the university - about 23:00 people started distributing condoms (buy throwing them on the tables) - sponsored by the uni. If america is truly concerned about young mothers give them free condoms, and let them learn how to use them.
Yes.
so taxes for Bono should be ridiculously low so that he can best decide how to donate his money, as it's all rightfully his anyway and the government has no right to levy taxes on BONO, HE'S FUCKING _BONO_ for chrissakes. people in Ireland can fuck off, dictatorships in africa need more AK-47s!
58% of American adults are absolutely certain that God exists. How scary is that?
wicked !!
naw thanks, mine just goes to eleven
Are you actually comparing the current state in America to that of the genocide in African nations or the Spanish Inquisition? I can't believe you were upmodded for that.
I prefer peachy cream, thank you very much.
you don't need to worry about them at all, ever. 'monads' are just another brainless, aimless 'design pattern'. i hates them. 
that's a shame.  you guys know of any other similar sites that aren't being fucked around with i could migrate over to?
daily show clips have already been put back onto youtube today.
Not really. You might not consciously notice the download times, but you will subconsciously. Browsing reddit (or Google) feels easy, as opposed to Digg.
okay, tell me about the First law of robotics again ... ?
that picture up top is a nice touch, but he didn't mention anywhere this part of the wikipedia page, something he referenced:   In May 2006, Richard qualified some of the claims made in the book.[57] With regards to the pool cue incident, she claimed it was a joke and that "Allen was simply testing her boyfriend's reflexes." With regards to the dentist quote, Jennifer claims that the book was a "novelization of the past" and written from the perspective of a young girl "surrounded by older brothers and a larger-than-life father". She claims to have a great relationship with her brother and noted that Allen stepped in for their father to walk her down the aisle at her wedding.[58]   
That's just dumb. lmao.
They've moved and will be working out of Wired's offices?  Ugghh.
Goodbye and thanks for all the fish.
&gt;You could argue that each time it happened, it was, a problem of "lost control", but that doens't make sense. As I said times over, events unroll with multitude of factors. I acknowledge that Bolshevik's **will** to punish and destroy Ukrainian peasants (and elite) will have played it's part. (I thought that was visible from my words). It does not make sense, though, to argue that it's the only motivator. Hence my words "you should not attribute to malice...". Attributing malice is something that I believe has to be done with great deliberation. Unfortunately, you jumped in with "they start with killing off the elite" (and this heated discussion ensued). &gt;Other than wanting to kill Ukrainians, how do you explain the Bolsheviks' actions of confiscating food: First, I appreciated the article linked there. Not to forget my usual story about various factors, **including** the desire to terrorize/destroy Ukrainians... We know how Stalin loved centralization (i.e. imposing control through it). This was happening all the time at all levels in USSR. So the agrary produce was confiscated by the state, then used as seen needed (meaning also to export it for good money, as one explanation goes, while at the same time brutally starving the population). How did it come that it was more important to export than feed people? Through multitude of factors, **including**... Does that somehow clears off Bolsheviks from accusations of genocide? I am not arguing that. Were Ukrainians somehow **guilty** for wanting their own nation etc? I am not arguing that neither. Does that mean that the sole purpose of confiscation etc. was to kill people? Sorry, but no. &gt;... Isn't the comissar in control of his actions? Perhaps this gets at the heart of the disagreement: you view the comissar as not being in control of his actions, while I do. Perhaps it does. We are fallible. He is in control up to a point. After that, he acts in fear of his superiors, in blind anger etc... Does it ultimately relieves him of responsability? No. It does establish mitigating factors, that need to be weighted in (as in premeditated murder vs. manslaughter etc). &gt;&gt;In other words, Stalin didn't go after Ukranians per se. He went after the opposition...   &gt;You seem to be saying that the millions of peasants (among them a lot of old people, women and children) who died, over a period of years, were opposition. And the fault seems to be on the Ukrainians, for the nationalism. Yes, I see that my words above could have easily ticked you off. This wasn't my intention and I apologize. I certainly didn't want to place the **blame** to Ukrainian nationalism (IMO: nationalism: good; control: obligatory!). I did want, however, to point to the complexity of it all. &gt;But even if the survivors of a purge act like "reformed" elite, and busy themselves driving tractors (or whatever it is the Bolsheviks want them to do), the elite - in the collective sense - has been destroyed. Again, no. Partly destroyed, partly subdued (with a lot of colateral damage (duck!)). I argue that utter destruction didn't happen. Did some "deflect to communism" (like your Jews there)? Yes. Were many scared witless? Yes. Were some sent to drive tractors? Yes. All of them? No. Does it mean none of those is a member of government/scientific/social/etc elite anymore? Sorry, but no. Whichever way you turn it around, you just can't do much of the things that Soviets did without qualified people (by qualified, I don't mean strictly "educated", more "capable to do whatever is needed"), hence my comments about rockets etc. Was the elite, let's put it this way, degenerated? Yes, let's call it such. &gt;The issue is that you tried to hold up Kaganovich as a member of the Ukrainian (elite) who survived, when Kaganovich self-admittedly saw himself as different True. I question his honesty and/or reason because of the following:  i) Saying "I did what's good for Jews", after the fact, in different circumstances, may have easily been his way to justify himself.  ii) "Doing what's good for Jews" is in huge conflict with cooperation with Bolsheviks who were slaying Jews  iii) in general, in USSR and elsewhere, for "The Party" members, communist ideology had to come before national feelings. If the two conflicted, the latter had to go. Even if he managed to sneak through, what about (ii)? I also pointed out that beside him, other Ukrainians "elite members", who were not Jews, survived, which you seem to agree, too. I just find the issue of nation mostly irrelevant when it comes to communism. Communism, as ideology, clearly put itself above nation. Therefore, the fact that some Jews were communist bigots (and later criminals) is not of importance. Therefore, I argue, they are members of Ukrainian elite. It's similar to the question of nobility as opposed to nation. If I remember correctly, this has happened in one of French-British medieval wars: while at war, the British nobility came in to help the French because they came under the threat of the rising plebs. (The religion played its part there as well, but the logic mostly stands.)
tmi
I can't believe that my boss's Treo phone has no power switch.  There is simply no way to turn the thing off.  Unbelievable.
I can't stand Murial Gray but by jove I agreed with practically everything she said in that article. Bookmarked.
That wouldn't work. You could obviously figure out which sections of the triangle need to be drawn and which don't, but it wouldn't work with psykotic's suggestion. The black triangles (meant to cancel out parts of the polygon being drawn) would still be seen on the page. If you were going to keep of Z depth then you could just implement it as an array of 1px divs. It would run like crap though. *Edit:* I just realised that you were referencing Painter's algorithm. If memory serves me correctly that is just sorting polygons by Z index. I suspect that they do that already in this demo. The problem still is in the drawing of polygons, i.e. that CSS can *only* display right angled triangles.
how crazy ? what next, giving republicans the country ?!?! no wait ...
Exactly. If Bono's hope is to give the most money to poor countries, he's not going to achieve it by letting the government decide how to do it. In fact, because he keeps more of his income now, he'll have an incentive to earn more, and even if he just gives half of the fraction the government would have taken in taxes to [HIPCs](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/HIPC), he'll be contributing more to his chosen cause.
&gt; Are you actually comparing the current state in America to that of the genocide in African nations or the Spanish Inquisition? No. I made a historical reference on ruling majority group of peoples ganging up on a minority, be it of religious, racial or political. That is not comparing states. If you want an actual comparison, I'd compare it to the kkk + their use of media in early-mid 20th.
If you read my full comment, then you would see this sentence:   "some people believe this, but I don't". If you've never wondered if there is a higher meaning to life, or if there is any "more" to it than what we see then you're an idiot. It's a question that anyone who thinks for themselves will face one day. Some people think that religion is the answer. If that makes them happy, then that's OK with me, but I think it's the easy way out.
Oops.. We thought you knew.
Debian Search engine based on Google coop.
Well that's the way it goes I suppose. Like I said, I think religion is a personal thing, so they *shouldn't* force their choice of religion onto their kids.
&gt; The 90's were so bad that the invasion was actually a turning point and chance for hope. Perhaps you could recall *why* it was so bad in the 90s. Something about containment, blockades and international sanctions, remember? How has the iraqi economy changed from 2002-2006, that'd be more relevant to the current discussion.
That's kind of true too. When I drink soda it's usually sugar-free. I find sugar too damn addictive (I'm not sure if sugar substitutes have the same qualities though).
I think this was posted a couple of weeks ago...good stuff anyhoo...
I do not see the problem. The frameworks for taxation are in place, and we all have to follow them. That U2 is not paying enough tax is the fault of the tax-systems not U2. We all have an obligation to pay the minimum possible tax so that the tax-system can be properly calibrated. I cant help but think this is just a thoughtless smear against somebody who has done more to fight social injustice than any other musician.
I don't get it.
Noise. STFU, please.
From the rubble rises 7 world trade center, one of the first sustainable office buildings in New York, and one of the safest buildings in the world.
&gt; If the application was built right, I was able to just used it. This is why you should never pilot a jet -- bicycles get you from place to place and can be "just used".
OK, so you're cynical AND a JavaScript programmer.  When the secret police come to round up all the geeks, you probably won't need to spend too much effort finding a good hiding spot.
The Turing Test isn't a zero-sum game - the humans don't "lose". (Maybe you're thinking of Judgement Day.)
hey that's pretty awesome http://porn.blosker.com/ http://www.mosexindex.com/Default.aspx
Not really. The Iraqi's feel that way every day. 9/11 was the US mainlands only taste of war and the reaction was quite extreme. It's just a shame no one can consider that the feelings of fear, anger and hatred they felt on 9/11 are the same feelings that those we bomb have.
Yeah, I don't know what they're thinking. Writeley did the same thing.
Must be election season...
&gt; Being friendly with the terrorists does not equal being the terrorists. Which nice, as otherwise we'd be the biggest terrorists on the planet: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/School_of_the_Americas
What about telling us "warm" or "cold"?
They saving that for 2008, but most of the laws to allow it to happen are in place. Of course, I'm joking here but there is a small part of me that does wonder...
videographers to the rescue!
videographers to the rescue!
Powershell scripts
Presumably they only intervene in extreme cases. If there were 13,000 people using your computer, they might get suspicious.
[PyPy](http://codespeak.net/pypy/).
It's because their value judgements are formed by television commercials, billboards, and magazine advertisements.
Reddit has ads. See the top right, just below the "hot/new/top" viewing options.  (Apparently nobody notices them.)
Monads are dirt simple, despite what the poorly written tutorials would have you believe. A monad is a data structure that supports the 'return' function and the &gt;&gt;= ('binding') operator. The implementations of these things depends on the monad. For example, consider the Maybe monad, which represents an optional value of some type. If you call 'return [some value]', it will give you a Maybe instance that represents that value. If you use the &gt;&gt;= operator with a Maybe, it will check whether you have a value: if you have Nothing, &gt;&gt;= returns Nothing. If you have something, it calls the function and returns the value. Maybes are simple -- play with them and see what happens. The thing that confuses most people is the IO monad. The IO monad is a clever trick that uses monad syntax to simulate imperative operations. How it actually works is that an IO instance is just a data structure that represents an imperative operation. For example, a function call to 'putStrLn "foo"' will just return an IO instance that represents printing the string "foo". These imperative operations can only actually be carried out by the Haskell runtime, either by returning them from the 'main' function (or by typing them at an interpreter prompt). In a sense, a Haskell program is strictly functional, but it takes no parameters and returns an imperative program. (Observe that if you execute 'putStrLn "foo" `seq` True' from an interpreter prompt, then nothing gets printed: it was the *return value* of putStrLn that actually does things.)
I just read all the "demands of men" and if these aren't the biggest group of women haters I don't know who are.  They complain they hate how everything is favored for women (which it isn't always that way) and then they turn around and demand things be all for the men.   Some of their points are sickening, like legalizing date rape, statatory rape, and spousal rape.  I hope these guys are a small group at the fringes because some of their demands are just as outrageous as some of the feminine ones.  The only difference is, these guys seem more in touch with imams who think women are merely meat for them.
Once in a while the Onion can still make me laugh out loud.   &gt;Bush added that the same liberal voters with whom his administration has traditionally been at odds would be "warmly welcomed and fully accommodated." Bush appealed to Democrats' "noble hearts," describing his traditional political foes as "a breed apart—passionate, dedicated Americans who can really make a difference."
Did it ever enter your mind that to use force against these "bodyguards" would actually weaken his position as an injured party especially because of his military history? If he was a marine, he would have been able to do much more harm to the people who tackled him than would have been justifiable in any court room. Besides, hostility when it isn't needed only makes the situation much more absurd. If Stark retaliated with force, the headline would read "Ex-Marine Attacks Republican Representitive." This is counter to his goals in questioning Allen. He, very wisely, decided not to use force. He understands that just because you can use force, doesn't mean you have to use it to solve your problems. EDIT: Spelling
I support: - gay marriage - polygamous marriage - the government having nothing more to do with marriage than requiring some standard list of legal side effects such as divorce, inheritance, power of attorney and custody of children be fully specified in the prenup. Unfortunately I'm white, so what the heck.
Agreed.
An old man once told me when he observed my habit as a young man of respectfully deferring to older folks that nasty young people grow up to be nasty old people.
A succinct description of Cold War era US proxy operations.
Heck yeah. All money transfers are entropic. Therefore with the best will in the world the potential for charity always outweighs that of welfare. Edit, clarifying: zero-sum money transfers are entropic. As are profitable money transfers, but the profit overwhelms the cost. *Take* money and you end up with less than there was to start with. *Make* money and you don't.
Old? Most of the footage is from Poseidon (the new film.)
This might be the only Christian satire around...
Me too! Don't you just love it when that happens.
&gt; No, as long as the leaders of Middle East countries that   &gt; keep their people poor, oppressed, and/or murdered are   &gt; useful to us, politically or economically, we're quite happy   &gt; to overlook their transgressions and whatever terrorism it   &gt; may foster. This is the liberal myth -- that our role consists in *overlooking*, or failing to meet our own declared standards.  It's nonsense.  The truth is that we actively support, shore up, and fund regimes that conduct horrendous human rights abuses, and are cradles of terrorism. It's not that we fail to reprove the Saudis for being barbaric despots (though Rice did comically refer to Saudi Arabia as 'improving', when compared with relative oases of freedom like Lebanon and Iran), we make their regime possible.
Can't you see what's wrong with your argument? Can't you really see the difference between defending a wife's honour and spitting on her? It's the complete opposite, dude; one is honourable, and the other is reprehensible.  
International treaties take precedence over any domestic law by convention. &gt; citizens are free to explore the boundaries of what is   &gt; permissible within the limits proscribed by that document   &gt; [US Constitution] Wonderful
Picture of the Hamburg Fishmarket that is flooded since early morning November 1. 2006
&gt; One night, rather than ignoring him when he flirted with me, I said yes, I’d go out with him. I willingly got into his truck.
&gt; So the treaty provisions have the same standing as   &gt; legislated law.  No, they supersede any national legislation, including the Consitution.  Therefore Congress cannot legislate around them. &gt; The US Constitution itself has greater power than either &gt;treaties or legislated laws because of its broad scope To repeat: "all treaties made, or which shall be made, under the authority of the United States, shall be the supreme law of the land; and the judges in every state shall be bound thereby, anything in the Constitution or laws of any State to the contrary notwithstanding." &gt; Regular laws and treaty provisions are not limited in this   &gt; fashion and therefore can be easily changed by legislative   &gt; action. Treaties can be changed by agreement of the high contracting parties, not by legislation.
実際ある会社にresume投げといたら、数日後に検索エンジン経由でその会社からたくさんアクセス来ました。
That is bullshit. It's obvious from watching the video that the Allen staffers did not see him as a suicide bomber but as a middle-aged white constituent. Bullshit.
So essentially your argument boils down to saying that the US can flout any of its international treaties without fear of retaliation?  That sounds like the sort of thing that is true (for any one country) for a very short period of time.
Yes, that's [correct](http://philip.greenspun.com/careers/) -- Rachel PhD Biology UCLA 1992.  Also [here](http://www.photo.net/learn/nudes/).  Varying degrees of NSFWness, of course. 
Or Vietnam, or Cambodia, or Lebanon?
Everyone who thought this was interestng should have a quick at this movie... http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0428541/ it's GREAT!!
Well that was excessively sad.  Beautifully drawn and animated, incredibly morose in tone.
For the IO Monad, you can think of it this way: 1. Haskell treats a function call with the same parameters as replaceable with the result of an earlier such call - so the IO monad passes around a concealed, always changing parameter. 2. Haskell will only guarantee to calculate A then B in that order if correct calculation of B is dependent upon the value of A. With monads, a &gt;&gt; b or a &gt;&gt;= b both force b to depend on the monadic value calculated by a, so you can guarantee they'll happen in proper sequence.
to the point en alle praktische informatie die je nodig hebt om er aan te beginnen.
Is that an advert for audible.com I see beside this comment?
How does Research and Development *generate* *income*, and are there changes ahead?
...except that this trick doesn't work on IE either.
Missed an important rule from "The five principles of property". Property types mustn't be logically contradictory! Physical property and patents/copyrights contradict. If it's my physical stuff, I must have a right to fashion it into any device or pattern I choose. If it's your idea, you have the right to invade my physical property and limit its uses. The two ideas aren't mutually compatible.
Well, yes, that's exactly what the article says. And their other example is that, on the weekend a violent movie comes out, violent crime goes down for a few hours.  The conclusion: violent-minded people tend to go and see it, and they can't physically be in a cinema _AND_ out committing crimes. They aren't claiming that this effect makes people less likely to rape someone while on the streets - but it does make them spend less time on the streets.
That truth is the only thing that matters is stupidity.
Please show me a hunter-gatherer tribe that cares for its children. And please demonstrate something other than neglect mixed with a heavy dose of using children as masturbation toys. In other words, show me a band of savages capable of *empathy* for children.
&gt; Call me an optimist, but electronic voting machines make me feel good about my country. You optimist!
What's going on here?
What's going on here?
Ahhh, one of the few times I actually feel sorry for the French :( Also, LOL AT MUSLIMS CLAIMING THAT ISLAM IS NON-VIOLENT.  I guess I do understand some atheists that try to insult and discredit Christianity on the basis of the actions of a few loudmouthed Fundi fools.  Sometimes it's just fun to stigmatize an entire group of people based on the actions of its minority ^_^
I don't know about US law but in the UK the guy could conceivably sue those heavy handed bouncers for assault.
Hmm multicore 
Upmodding this even though I disagree with the "article's" statement. Reddit's a facilitator and not a content provider.  What Reddit "provides" is the backend that allows people to share and discuss stories.  True, Reddit owes some of its popularity to the users that populate it, but also to the easy and attractive style with which Reddit has been designed. So yeah, claiming that the users did "all the work" and Reddit reaped all the rewards is quite far-fetched.
*If I get angry with someone, I just say, “F you,” and they know that not only am I a follower of Christ, but that I also mean business and will* **not hesitate to take them out.** Ahahahaha, that just made me laugh so hard. Overall I'm simply unsure if the article is trying to be funny or 100% serious.  I'm also unconvinced that the author's decision to use "letters" for swear words (F you, A-hole, etc) is any better then replacing them with homonims...
Shock is a major factor here. In order to survive something this traumatising the brain just shuts off and the person continues in a completely disassociated state. In order to have any hope of getting a conviction this woman would have to have gone straight to a hospital and been tested and all physical evidence from her clothes collected. However, she did what was instinctual, not logical. She went home and she washed the blood off. Quite likely she would have suffered from post traumatic stress also and it would have been months before enough rational thought returned for her to realise the full extent of her error in not going straight to the police and at that stage the chances of getting a conviction are far too low to warrant putting herself through that extra trauma.
Monads are hard to grasp if you are procedural minded, because they are just a clever way of achieving the same features which is already implicit in procedural languages. Like mutable variables, sequential execution, global mutable state, exceptions, IO, and so on. So the power of monads is really when you choose to *not* use them. Then you have a more constrained language which is easier to understand and debug. If you need only some of the  procedural features, e.g. to be able to read from a global state but not write to it, then you can choose a monad that allows only this. Monads may also allow language features which is not supported in the usual imperative languages, like continuations and nondeterministic programming. Most of the tutorials on monads focus on how they are implemented rather than why you would one to use one. Thats probably why they dont make any sense.
Not quite. You can do what you want with your property as long as your rights don't conflict with those of others. You can't exercise your right to fire your gun if it interferes with my right to live. All property rights have constraints like this, that they're constrained is not a contradiction.
Are you trying to imply that religious people don't practice what they preach? Say it ain't so! Catholic priests abusing choir boys, their superiors covering up for that, Muslims trying to tell us how non-violent they are and if we disagree they'll smash your face in, Christians claiming they are the paragons of the moral right, which in secret they're having gay affairs and lying their arses off. I'm a bit fed up with religion, and I would ban it in an instant if I wasn't a libertarian. Damn, the price we pay for allowing religious lunacy in society.
No, we don't have anyone on the right. Nobody's talking about Bush and it's getting boring already.
Yoick congratulates Charles River Ventures for setting up its $250k seed funding program, Quickstart.
Want to avoid the fate of Kiko and Puck RSS. Here is how a company should tackle accelerated depreciation head-on
But this isn't an either/or. No matter what else he's done that's good, it is a very hypocritical position for Bono to be in; to be telling the Irish Government that they must spend more of their people's tax-money in aid, but being unwilling to pay his share into the kitty this money would be taken from.
Libertarian?! Ewwww, now I have Libby cooties :( Talking about "banning things in an instant", I'd ban the Libertarian party because I'm the product of the system and totally unwilling to engage in their version of "freedom without bounds".
your point is what exactly? getting even a fivefold performance increase for python code is nothing special, and will still make python orders of magnitude more inefficient than a comparatively well-coded properly compileable static language.   
"All four reddit employees will relocate from Boston to Wired’s San Francisco office and become part of Wired Digital."  http://www.techcrunch.com/2006/10/31/breaking-news-conde-nastwired-acquires-reddit/
Your only problem is you are a coward.
Don't tell me about your choice to do nothing and expect me to... what? What am I supposed to get from this article? Outrage, or empathy, or what? Is she trolling for suggestions? If so:  I would spray-paint RAPIST on his car, it takes just a few seconds in the middle of the night, and causes him a lot of bother, especially when his fiancee wonders why it happened the SECOND time.   After 26 years, no one would suspect her. Except the rapist.
That does not solve the problem described. If you float the inputs to the right, their left edges will not align.
Waka-waka!
Upmoded for being insightful and dead-on-balls accurate.
Disclosure: I wrote this article for Marketing Pilgrim's search engine marketing scholarship contest. I make no bones that visiting it will help me in the competition, but I wrote it primarily because I hope people will enjoy reading it, so I do want the word to get out...!
Microsoft have decided to pursue Department of Defense 5015 Chapter 2 (5015.2) certification for Microsoft Office SharePoint Server (MOSS) 2007. The move rings logical-like. MOSS needs this key records management cert to stand competitive in the GOV arena, where other Enterprise CMS competitors such as Xythos and Stellent are making headway.
Beautiful, peaceful
no dude, these are the real deal.  Well, as far as I know!  I know that the zonkeys are real.
Finely carved pumpkins.
Difference is that Reddit generally don't send out parking fines to people.
maybe it won't suck so much after they buy it?
I don't know if this will help.. but I had this problem after I had published my application, It was driving my round the bend having to kill the process everytime... to get round the problem on the signing tab of the application properties I unchecked the ClickOnce Manifest and also on the security tab   unchecked the enable ClickOnce Security setting... I no longer have this issue I just have to reestablish the settings on final build!
Video Tutorial - Tutorial of Photoshop teaching to do a menu for sites web 2.0
Shoulda waited for Google. They would pay you, like, $8 Billion.
scroll down - it's for PC only.  "This game is likely to offend some people, heres what my submission to wikipedia said(it's been deleted)"The game depicts the character "the crocodile guy" a clear parody of Steve Irwin who must feed live human babies to the hungry crocodiles in a nature reserve, this eludes to the controversial incident on 2 January 2004, when Steve Irwin carried his one-month-old son, Bob, in his arm whilst hand-feeding a chicken carcass to a 3.8-meter-long saltwater crocodile at on of his private shows." There’s also a second stage where you fight sharks and try to hug a stingray."
Of course he is serious e.g. the use of F-ing indicates the sincerity of the writer's emotion in &gt;I know Jesus said that when we lust in our minds it is the same as actually committing adultery, but this is a totally F-ing different deal.   
Some magic beans...
Well, Japan **is** superior so I guess that's ok =3
In that case I'm having a hard time seeing the "moral superiority" of using "A-hole" versus "anus hole" versus "asshole". If you feel strongly enough you either avoid swearing entirely in favor of another way to let off steam (or even *le gasp* getting your emotions under control so you have little dealing with anger) or swear to your heart's content :s Edit: Also, that's a guy writing that?  Though it was a girl!  So... what?  Someone says "fuck" and he drops? :P
I found very useful screencast demonstrating how to use Moodle as learner and as educator
&gt;building infrastructure, paying government employees, and GASP improving national defense. HA! Are you talking about the Irish government? National defence, thats a good one.  Infrastructure, has never been our governments strong point, and it's not cause they don't have the money. As for government employees, the only ones who seem to do their job with any kind of efficiency is the tax office, EVERYONE else is rubbish, health, education, etc.
Monad n. - a rationalization of state, invented by functional programmers so that they can do what is mundane in non-FP languages in a way that requires hours of explanation to the uninitiated. call-with-continuation n. - a rationalization of labeled branches, invented by functional programmers.  See monad.
Hardly a day goes by without Bush making some stupid statement that insults some member of our society. Now Kerry makes a very bad joke (and oh yeah, he apologized for it too) and it's treated like treason. Not to mention that Kerry is speaking from experience, having actually been in a war, unlike our President. I hope the American people don't allow themselves to be led down the garden path with this tempest in a teapot.
I wish to go into this hotel!
I believe that's exactly what charitable deductions provide the opportunity for him to do. Anything he donates to charity gets deducted from his taxable income so he'd only pay taxes on what he wants to keep for himself - evidently more than he thinks the rest of us should be allowed. :)
&gt;But there was a day and a time when nobody would have blinked twice at someone getting their ass kicked for asking a man "Why did you spit on your first wife?" loudly in public. Not when you are a politician. How he treats someone who he is *supposed* to love is quite telling when you are wondering how he will treat voters he has never met. I think the point is that "he's not a very nice person" and probably should not be in public office. But the other guy was an asshat. When I hassle politicians, I try to at least be clever and ask a decent question.
Yeah, breaking the AT&amp;T wiretap scandal was so mainstream-media-boring.
The rapist may rap the others. Even if you feel embarrassed, you have to report it so that the rapist CAN'T make more victims!
&gt; I started writing it because the original client requires GHC (the Glasgow Haskell Compiler), which is not available on all platforms. Are these platforms worth the effort to get something from a darcs repository? 
If you watch the videos, you can see that he did not resist whatsoever. Didn't raise his fists and only moved his arms to fall. If he wants to campaign against this politician, he's going about it the 100% correct way. If he'd responded, even after they charged him, he would be partly responsible. Instead he took the Ghandi approach. Shame it wasn't for something worthwhile instead of slinging divorce dirt.
Because popularity does not depend solely (if at all) on page load time?
Welcome to the REAL WORLD of Virginia!
err, stupid.
And the best way to deal with the rising number of young single mothers is to tell them "Don't have sex", and give them NO education about contraceptives? You can see why people think this is a religious thing; you usually only see that level of delusion in the faithful.
But, if you are going to ignore the bullshit, what's the point in going to church?
Great quote: "The good news is that the TSA has responded quickly to the report. The bad news is that their response is to start an investigation to find out who leaked the test results."
You're right! But, instead of preaching abstinence, why don't we just sterilize people? Of course, I don't mean you or me, just the hordes of people who shouldn't be breeding.   
Consider for a moment all of the other "non-fiction" that was later found to be false. Apparently you feel that if it is words written ten it must be absolutely true. There is nothing on the page at all to validate the story, that is was true, non-fiction, or any editorial comments to support the statements. I am suggesting that people consider that NOT EVERYTHING they read is absolute truth. Go ahead and downmode the crap out of me if you want. I personally believe that skepticism is a healthy approach to anything in print (or especially online). As I said before: she is a fiction writer. This is NOT outside the realm of fiction. I also said it MIGHT be true.  
The one true major problem and powerful antidote is rarely mentioned by anyone. The problem is too many humans - each one leaving a trail of mess and carbon through their lifetimes. In this respect China must be commended for hitting the root of the problem more than 20 years ago with their one baby policy. That alone has saved an awful lot of future impact on the environment. India is a population disaster zone with no end in sight.
I found out about Reddit through you Aaron, and I am sure lots of others...
Advertising isn't about finding out what I like, it is about telling me what they want me to like...
With "baby after bath"-smell, no less. That's almost unbelivable, but I believe it.
My general reaction to this is it could relate to individualistic vs collectivist societies.   The westerners they are talking about sounds like they are refering Western Europe rather then the US specifically.  I'd expect to see similar results if they performed the same tests in the US.
Generalized, you can just have tags and the ability to filter content based on them.
I don't really think that is the problem here, My issue with this is not whether Bono choses to keep his money or not but more to do with the fact that He constantly lectures people and governments on giving more to save the world.  "I'm sorry I don't give more Bono, but you know I have to pay quite a lot of Taxes (and as a percentage of my earnings a hell of a lot more taxes than you) because rich people in my country like to avoid tax." I have never been a big fan of him... blah blah blah. Sorry I wont go on because I know what he does helps, but I think He could either do it better or at least stop being so goddam patronising about it.    
I think it's pretty clever actually.
What? nsfw is gone? Nooooooooooooo!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Uh, no that would be about a hundred million dollars to never really have to worry about money anymore, unless you are unbelieveably stupid.
&gt; A familiar paradox about leftist celebrities in the entertainment industry is that their embrace of progressivism almost never includes a wholehearted embrace of progressive taxation, i.e., the principle that the richer you get, the larger the percentage of your income you ought to pay in taxes. What a bone-headed article.  Choosing between playing roulette with the spending habits of elected leaders and giving directly to a charity, there is only one rational choice. Bono should turn to the Irish government and say, "look if you can ear-mark the difference between what we're paying now and what we would be paying, for debt relief, we'll talk."
Bullshit. Campaigning against third world debt doesn't mean he loses the right to lower his tax burden. Where will that money go anyway? To help some charitable cause? Bono spending his hard-earned money on *himself* is much better than it going into some government's coffers.
Seems it didn't affect the stock price. http://finance.google.com/finance?q=GOOG (click on 3m, no permalink :()
I think it says alot about the character of both Bono and the author of the article when the only thing you can muster up that will (attempt to) smear the name of Bono is that he wants to pay fewer taxes.  IMHO as the global economy grows, we will see alot of stuff like this happening.  The savy investment types - artists or no - will continue to move their assets to the most attractive environment.  For Bono, that happens to be where they don't tax artist's royalties.  Big effing deal.
I guess Conde Nast is a family friendly organization. Can someone tell this noob how to get a list of the existing sub-reddits?
One-way hashes (e.g. MD5) are mathematically impossible to get back to the original value. That's the point. So 192.168.0.1 becomes daaf1d27fd83421a66e32ea8d7f37e68
&gt; Why has nobody done anything about this? What, you mean hire a bunch of autistics as TSA employees? I thought they already did that...
Bush: WMD, Torture, Telling the truth... OMFG who cares?
Full confirmed U.K. list!
back? I never knew it existed.
The guy was pushing buttons, but thats part of the life of a politician. If you can't take that type of scrutiny than you should choose a new line of work - period. It still doesn't defend the politicians hired hands from getting physical with the guy. I personally would of been swinging for the fences if any of those jerks put thier hands on me.
Click prefs over on the top right, then click "subreddits" in the "tabs" section.  That's the best way I've come up with.
Go back to FARK
Look at the bottom of this page.
Excellent job pointing out a hole in this story. I have a gut feeling that this story is fiction. I think it may be some free PR for her upcoming book of poetry.
Yes.  Insurgents always time their attacks to coincide with US elections.  Except for ALL THE OTHER ATTACKS THAT HAPPENED EVERY DAY IN IRAQ FOR THE LAST 3 YEARS. 
Thanks to you both.
It appears the nsfw.reddit links/comments still exist, but the lists are hidden.
How is the 3D grid different than a particle system? Would increasing edge length on the grid reduce processing requirements? I've written flag particle systems that are 2D grids, having each particle effect the position of its nearest peers. Is this the general idea?
I was unimpressed with NSFW. Pure commercial-site low-quality boobage and teaser pages. A collaborative filter won't work if all you feed in is dross!
That's because they've responded to the emotional impact of the story, and refuse to beleive that they may have been duped. I am a skeptic, and I think more people should be.
nackerela, what would you want your daughter to do if she was raped? Too many women are trapped in cycles of violence around the world. One of the first steps to stopping it is to make that personal pain visible. Nobody should or can force a woman to report a crime like this, but we should teach our daughters to get back up and fight.
I am enjoying a couple of very, very good Charleston Chews this morning...Mmmmmm...Sugar...aaaaaaaagggggagaaaaaagagagaaa
I see, so she is a coward or a victim?
Why can't just software patent be shorter? The up side of patent is that it encourage knowledge sharing in the end. After the patent expire, the knowledge must be in public domain. What could be better than that? Public domain is even better than GPL because it gives right to everyone to do anything.  Company want to have patent because it gives them some returns and encourage them to do research.  Many idea are hard to come up with, you would have not think about it yourself, but its implementation is so easy, once someone tell you what it is then you can go build it in a couple days. Many nifty features like that cost millions to research. The company that is willing to do the research will want some kind of guarantee that they will get profit back from investing. Or else most, if not all, company will just sit and wait for someone to announce new idea and then they all will just get that free cake.  The problem with software patent as it is is because it is too long for the software world. New software technique is considered old in 2-3 years. But patent last for more than ten years. That is why software patent makes software innovation stale than encourage it. What if patent live is only 3-5, years after filing. Can't you wait for that? 5 years give the company that invent it enough time to get their profit back and it is not too long to stale the innvoation. And after that it is public domain for good.  By having short patent live and expire after filing you can prevent patent pirate.   Just a thought.
A dollar wasted is a dollar wasted.  I'm sure that some very needy people in the third world are happy with his choice even if you're not.
Hmm I've no idea what the American Libertarian Party believes in, and I always find it tough to sign up with something like a political party because it's rare I believe in 80% of what any particular group says. I am simply me with my own beliefs, and they are, roughly speaking: - allow people the right to say stupid things - allow people the right to reply to the above - allow people the right to harm themselves as long as it doesn't harm anyone else, providing they are of sound mind and know what they're doing and so on. I guess I agree with many of the sentiments on this page too http://www.flownet.com/gat/LiberalConservatism.html
From the article: &gt; Today, though, Reddit’s path as a stand alone company might be a dead end because Digg, their competitor, is now an industry standard And wasn't Yahoo the industry standard search engine circa 1998? Wasn't, um, Slashdot the industry standard before Digg?
Funny. Now you want NSFW? A few days ago nobody cared to turn NSFW into an acceptable subreddit. 4 months ago I asked to post more non-porn on NSFW: http://reddit.com/info/95as/comments (18 up, 13 down) On NSFW itself someone asked a similar question in http://nsfw.reddit.com/info/8uu7/comments with 68 up and 12 down, but nobody really cared to change anything. There are few dozens of free porn lists on the web, but only one reddit. NSFW wasn't used the way it was expected. I don't think it's wise to bring it back.   
Hehehe, coming from Boston they're surely already used to paying way too much $ for small digs....
Why does he deserve special privilege? s/Bono/every person/
Thanks! Now I can skip the list writing and go right to the store, a real time saver!
Did I read somewhere Paul mention that the guys that run reddit would turn up millionaires? So I wager, the amount must not be less than 5-8 millions.
I think we've already lost the "War On Terror", or at least, under full Republican control, we've made no real progress what so ever.
In a related/stupid question:  How does reddit make money?   They don't have adverts.  Yeah sure there's a donation section plus gear for sale, but really, what kind of revenue does that bring?  With all the multi-million dollar figures people are throwing around, there has to be significant return on investment potential.  Can anyone enlighten me?
&gt; Police had used Tasers more than 70,000 times as of last year, Congress' Government Accountability Office said. .2% chance of death from Taser seems like a lot better odds than the chance of death from gunshot or serious/lethal injury from police batons.
More likely 80 years ago... movies at the beginning of the century were already touted as being "the most shocking experience ever!!". Nothing has changed, except that the bar has consistently been raised.
772 down votes??? Helllooooo ladies.....
lindsay is my fave!
I'm interested to know what platform was missing? GHC bootstraps via GCC on just about anything now (I think only the arm is being troublesome due to floating point, and some older things - there's no vax port, for example).
Ugh, this again?
Headline is slightly misleading: one billionth of a second is the actual exposure (shutter speed equivalent I guess). The first picture was taken a millisecond after the bomb went off. Awesome and frightening pics though.
I'd swear I've seen this somewhere before....
Aren't there a lot of, um, you know... guns in Half Life? Or maybe he works at one of *those* biotech labs.
For people who didn't go to prep school, a million dollars is sufficient to maintain a comfortable lifestyle.  That's about $50,000 a year in interest at a reasonable level of risk, after inflation. And 50K *will* let you live comfortably, unless you got used to caviar tastes while your parents were putting you through prep school.
"the attacker would have to be within the LAN in order to make the attack work, and, of course, it would only work on systems using ICS, which is disabled by default. Furthermore, the attack would have no effect on any third-party firewall being used by the PC" This lessens the severity of the bug, I guess, but I'm glad I use a hardware-based router none-the-less.  Ooh, poetry.
Thats probably what they were anticipating.  I imagine the original servers were not equipped to handle an influx of millions of curious new users.
Not "Google", it is "The Google".
So true. I still keep reddit, digg and delicious as textlinks on my page. I get a lot of traffic from there, so I might as well promote back.
While yesterday's events in Sadr City demonstrate the desire of the Iraqi people and the Iraqi Government to see Americans depart, Rumsfeld is about to seek congressional authorization for additional money for oil-rich Iraq.
&gt; What I am saying is not that America cannot win in Iraq but   &gt; that will lose in Iraq (and I am 100% certain it will lose)   &gt; as a result of defeatism at home. What do 'win' and 'lose' mean in this war?  If winning is a stable and democratic Iraq, then sorry fella, but that is not in your gift.  The reason for widespread 'defeatism' and media scrutiny (which, by the way, has largely soft-soaped the war) is because large numbers of Americans, with justice, don't see why the US should be fighting in Iraq,  Administration propaganda notwithstanding. If technology makes it harder for states to conduct their wars in secret, and therefore makes it more difficult to go to war, except when the majority of the population think the price is worth it, and approve the action, then that is a good thing imho. Cold War's over, baby.
Havent you heard? It is "The Google" not "Google".
This is absurd. It would require Bush&amp;Co. to admit that they were completely wrong and inept. But Bush would rather send more men to die pointlessly than admit failure.
&gt; Now you want NSFW? A few days ago nobody cared to turn NSFW into an acceptable subreddit.  &gt;   &gt; 4 months ago I asked to post more non-porn... Uh, i think the porn is the part they miss. &gt; There are few dozens of free porn lists on the web, And there are a few dozen link aggregators, message boards, and voting systems. But Reddit is the best. So it's no surprise that some people preferred to find their porn the Reddit way. 
hahaha, so I can't tell you that I personally have never heard that phrase? Sorry, I wasn't implying it's never been said, just that I've heard "White America" often but never heard the same with Canada. (edited original post for clarity) ;)
It's nice to see a human face on this whole deal.
War sometimes is the answer. Pacifism always kills.
Nah.  It's OK that it's gone.
The wit is searing my brain!
Depends on the audience. Some sites have different numbers.   [Google's Web Authoring Statistics](http://code.google.com/webstats/index.html) gives you some graphics in SVG. And one well known German online magazine has less than 30% visitors with IE: http://www.keks.de/web/heise-browser 
I was under the impression that the hubble was 'condemned' and deemed unfit for further spending... They must finally be turning it into the ultimate death-laser, after all.
Even the US federal government is using offshore tax havens, go figure.  Progressive taxation (like everything progressive) is just candy coated bullshit.  Taxes are theft, high taxes ought to spark revolt.
WE WANT IT BACK!
I can't get over the "fair share" argument.  There is no such thing, never was, and never will be an equitable way to determine one's "fair share" of how much tax to pay.  User fees work so much better--you want a service, you pay for it, the poor are subsidized.
&gt; Uh, i think the porn is the part they miss. Just pick one of the following and forget NSFW reddit, large companies usually don't want to host porn even if it's only links. - http://porn.blosker.com  - http://www.socialporn.com  - http://www.spankwire.com  - http://www.mosexindex.com 
&gt; And there are a few dozen link aggregators, message boards, and voting systems. But Reddit is the best. So no surprise that some people preferred to find their porn the Reddit way. Have you actually visited nsfw.reddit.com? There was not much voting going on there. A lot of &lt;=0 stuff on the news page and links with 1 to 5 points on the hot page. 
Yes, it's an advantage.  Version control in Smalltalk is much more advanced than with files, it's not a pain at all.  We still check our code into source repositories, others can still find and load packages into other images, but our version control systems are language aware in a way that diffing two text files simply can't be.  I have a complete method history in my image for every save, not just for every check in.  There was a time when what you say was true, but no more.
You're right, some people do use images to store data, Gemstone is a great example, but that isn't what this article was discussing, mencius just had a knee jerk reaction and ranted without actually understand the article.
Free NYTimes account login info,  Username: talkpast  Password: talkpast  http://www.bugmenot.com/view/www.nytimes.com
[I](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2005/10/how-can-they-so-defile-place-where.html) [assume](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/02/bono-will-spout-for-cash.html) [you](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/02/bonos-friends.html) [are](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2005/06/u2-court-struggle-for-old-hat.html) [aware](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/08/wij-zijn-een-lerse-band.html) [that](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2005/10/bono-and-that-was-my-idea.html) [Bono](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/08/bono-buys-into-media.html) [is](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2005/10/bono-gets-confused-over-his-role-in.html) [a](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2005/11/bono-intervenes-in-canadian-election.html) [complete](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/09/nought-on-returns-not-on-retorts.html) [and](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/01/bono-wants-you-to-shop-your-way-into.html) [utter](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/05/bono-editor-condis-top-ten.html) [cunt](http://xrrf.blogspot.com/2006/05/bono-comes-to-market.html).
You mean like at http://reddit.com/info/a3sz/comments , which made it to the top of the hot page?
Asking questions of public record is not being an asshole. Remember politicians are one of several type positions in society that are in the spotlight and voters should know about such things as why divorce records are sealed; violence, abuse, etc., as well as why was someone who is seeking office (re-election in this case) was arrested in 70s, war protest, drugs, draft dodging? who knows, but the voters have a right to know. That is called due diligence and exercising responsibility when voting!
Hate to break it to you Democrats, but their bodyguards do the same thing. I once found myself accidently in the midst of a Hillary rally when she was running for Senator and noticed that anyone with an anti-Hillary placard was hustled away.  You can only be a rabid supporter and get to see these people.  Also, the entire media event was completely stage-managed, made for tv, but made to look like it was candid and impromptu.   DC is just like Hollywood, in other words.  It's not worth your time to even worry about politics anymore because there is *nothing* there for the average American.  If you have big money you can attend a $500/plate fundraiser and buy your access.  Otherwise, it is best to just go about your business and not make waves until the eventual revolution.   
Please put it back. I need it and love to read.
Yup, if you put the Glock in just so, they don't know what it is because they're only trained on some old revolver from the 1970s and it's really big.
I am really hoping for legalization, it will immediately take 50% of the liberal population out of the game.. for good.
They obviously need some jam or something put on their white pieces of toast.
wow. just wow. literally very scared of what will happen with another term of full republican rule.
I never would've thought...
People 18 and older are adults and are responsible for their own behavior.  Don't put me in a straitjacket because my neighbor's crazy.
Did you miss the memo? Chuck Norris is not so tough anymore http://reddit.com/info/nnol/comments
Laws have been modified for military use. [via wikipedia]    1. A robot will not harm authorized Government personnel but will terminate intruders with extreme prejudice.  2. A robot will obey the orders of authorized personnel except where such orders conflict with the Third Law.  3. A robot will guard its own existence with lethal antipersonnel weaponry, because a robot is bloody expensive. 
In order for this hashing to be useful, each a particular IP needs to hash to the same value each time (so that they can be compared for equality).  This means there can be no "salting" of the hash.  This means that anyone can simply run the hash for all 2^32 IP addresses and store a table of the results, rendering this technique useless for privacy. The one-wayness of md5 doesn't help here.
Actually, some Europeans were more canonical than others. Northern and western were better, southern and eastern not so much. Even after WWII, the refugees who came to the US were often referred to as "dirty DPs" (displaced persons). But here's the kicker: in my own ethnocentrism, I neglected even to mention the most fucked over people in American and Canadian history: the people who lived in North America before the Europeans came in the first place. They were almost entirely wiped out in a systematic program of genocide (read what the great democrat Thomas Jefferson has to say about this), and those who remained were cut off from their own cultures, languages, and traditions in an attempt to "civilize" them.
we alllll know that the only necessary tool is a crowbar; theres got to be one of those about what with all the 'artfully placed wooden crates' that need opening!
some people have entirely too much time on their hands ... somebody ought to direct them to reddit.com ...
i love it
You mean recreated in CGI. (wink wink, nudge nudge)
What does him being a marine have to do with anything?
Men very often do not satisfy their partners as they make basic fundamental errors, all are easily corrected and are generally related to the differences in the male and female psyches.  So what are the top mistakes guys make?  Let's look and find out and discover how to be a better lover that your partner will certainly appreciate!
No, I didnt think it is possible that I missed it.. I did a page copy to use the list somewhere else, I went line by line and eliminated the fluff and just remade a list I needed for work. I do not think it was there. I went through the list and then noticed Easter wasn't there, I am not religeous so it was odd I noticed it in the first place without consulting a calender, but I did...  then I redid the copy/paste and I still didn't see it.. so unless there is another page on Wiki that lists US Holidays..  It didn't have it.    
Infamously, generals always fight the last war.
I don't know if "essential" is correct.  Unfortunately, 37s probably doesn't know if the buttons are being used?  if they are being used, taking them away could actually make reddit / digg, etc. harder to deal with.
perhaps you missed out on the "wired sucks" era.
Yeah I thought about that too. I guess the whole energy conscious thing is just an excuse you can tell yourself (or friends) for buying something like this.
s/read/wank/
Not safe for whose work?  Not mine!
cyn.in is offering a free Professional Edition to all customers. Free for life! Get your site today!
Thought-provoking commentary on the boom in housing costs and how those skyrocketing prices are affecting the daily drive.
hout bay, cape town, south africa :)  and no houses have this view... its taken from chapman's peak drive. but cape town is the most beautiful city in the world :)
ok well that clears it up..   say, how is it back there in 1860?   The problem today is what I mentioned.. Liberals think they are the only group holding to any resemblance of those ideals and it pisses me off to no end, you see it on reddit and other webstes and blogs every day. Conservatives are Evil and Liberals are Saints (if they were to believe in that sort of thing) Just getting tired of it all.   
Congrats. I just started browsing reddit. It's like digg with a craigslist stripped down sensibility which makes it faster and easier to surf and rate stories.
fast enough?   Sorry you lost me on that?  what do you mean?
You are trapped in simple-minded, apologist, infantile thinking. The point is not whether Bono has the right to decide how to spend his own money. The point is; does Bono think everyone has this right, or just a select few who agree with his politics? If he supports lower taxes in general, then I support his decision. Otherwise he is a hypocrite and doesn't deserve to be taken seriously on his worldwide "philanthropy" tour.
what? there are humans on this website? I thought I was arguing with a machine?
Hmmm something to think about. There is a probably a point where there are so many bookmarking icons that users just shut down and don't click any.
how about if Hillary gets the Whitehouse in 08?  are you still fucked..?
don't like polls :/
Not the tapes I was hoping for, but still cool.
lost moon eh?
Hmmmm pending lawsuits... maybe he should work for YouTube? And get bought by Google. (joke)
A friend of mine was almost raped by some shit. Much later, an old college acquaintance was going to marry this shit. The girl invited my friend to the wedding; of course, she declined. The girl asked why, my friend told her what happened. So the girl accuses my friend of trying to destroy her relationship because, she believes, my friend is jealous and wants to steal her shitty fiance from her. Now my friend firmly believes all women can burn in hell. She's even more misogynistic than reddit nerds. That's why I like her. ;-)
When it's Bono Vox, he has the right to avoid taxes. When it's someone else, e.g. Bill Gates, oh the horror he's avoiding taxes because he is such a bad guy.  Well, it's reddit
meet chicks to fuck.
Guess he's not beating around the Bush anymore.   
it was a setup...  being a Marine gives him more credibility and deflects the possibilities of a left wing ruse Allen's "staff" were ripe for the picking because they are a bunch of dumbasses and the dems were smart enough to know it. setup.
He doesn't.  Everyone should be able to avoid oppressive taxes.
&gt;you can't rely on people having Flash uh, yeah, you really can... they're a lot more likely to have flash than a browser that is 100% compatible with whatever CSS hack you might try to do
you are a dumbass.. this was a setup and he WILL sue and the entire POINT of this confrontation was to generate publicity against the "evil Allen"
i think this top 10 is really cool and inspiring for short players
Come on, now. They didn't beat him up, they just got [got a little rough](http://reddit.com/info/ok1o/comments). :P
Actually, your headline sucks, and this is just more evidence at how influential US propaganda is. "He's very kind to Christians"... Iraq was always a society that accepted every religion.  The Prime Minister was a Christian.  It was never a breeding ground for Islamic extremists (until Bush invaded, that is). But the US propaganda machine is very powerful, and most people today do not know any of the facts.
Not to mention those free meals and bring-your-own-dog stuff.
Thank you for saying the obvious.  Can't upvote this enough.
if someone had done this to Kerry, you would be calling him a bigot or a Rove lackey.
Where will it be located?  Will it compete effectively with the one that separates England and France? 
No.. this is the M.O of liberals...  insult and call names and then say the reps did it.
Big deal.  So far, 600,000 Iraqi's have died as a result of this war.  Who should we kill now to ensure we "win"?
If you're producing blog entries (in the usual case) so prolifically that submitting them all is perceived as spammy, it probably means that most of them are crap anyway.
I guess you're probably required to work for the man for a certain amount of time, but I hope your next venture can be just as successful.
funny how NASA failed to keep track of things like this...and the original video footage...etc.
i never said it was...  you are telling reddit what you like and don't like, so the advertiser can target effectively without having to "do" anything...  advertisers don't want to tell you what you like, they know that that is rarely effective...  what they would like to do though is tell you to like things that they sell that they know you'll be interested in...
So, we're not going to win.  Is that an argument for cutting and running sooner rather than later?
&gt;&gt;"Maybe he wants to decide how to deploy his money most efficiently rather than leaving it to the government; maybe he just want to have more money for himself, either way it is his decision." pick and choose which "poor" to help?  sounds a bit non-liberal to me
If you attack successful people for giving to charity, it pretty much makes the next lucky rich guy NOT bother.  Stupid.
It's easier for some to quit than others I guess.
My guess is that he really did it because he could.
Makes one question a company that can be so incredibly profitable in a warzone. One has to wonder how on earth they can have, "posted a 25 percent rise in earnings, beating Wall Street forecasts, on robust spending by producers on oil and gas output, particularly in North America."[1]  You have to then wonder how they keep raking it in, well here we see how.  I wonder if we will care in 3 years when Cheney is back at Halliburton.  Sources:   [1 ]http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20061022/bs_nm/energy_halliburton_earns_dc 
You mean having to transform blocks into explicit variables via lambda/whatever?  Me thinks it fits in the "kludgy, haskish and ugly" part of why Smalltalk's better than Ruby on this account. In fact, it's so ugly that nobody ever does it, and so verbose that you wouldn't implement conditional with it anyway.
That's like if they shut down all of Reddit, and i said, "Hey, go to one of these: * Slashdot  * Digg  * Netscape.com  * MSNBC
Congrats, guys. Big hand from everyone for a job well done :)
True, but you could still come up with something.  Say, for example, bitwise XOR the IP's hash with some private 128-bit key. I guess there's a question of performance after a while... but the point being you could always come up with an alternative to plaintext storage if it's THAT important to you.
Well, apparently all the people who voted for this story feel differently.
Smalltalk hasn't yet "arrived"? Where?
stupid. every citizen should do all they can to legally avoid paying any more in tax than they absolutely have to. taxation is nearly the worst possible thing you can do with your money, given that governments waste the vast majority of it starting useless wars or lining their own pockets. good for bono; he realizes he can do more good with his own money than his silly government can.
I am sure that at least some of his viewers realize that it's not a show based on fact but instead a show thats intent is for people to laugh, a comedy.
Likewise for a discussion about a language's terseness...
can't believe i actually waited for this one to download... http://one.revver.com/revver/browse/Most+Watched#_show_video_31264 has an interesting ending though...
that's no moon
ipanywhere? I don't get it?
how is letting people keep slightly more of their OWN money 'highly generous'?  wow, you're stealing 5% less than half my money now to waste, er, redistribute as you see fit? thanks for that generosity!
The shapes of the water look nice, but the colors are far off and too opaque.
yes and george bush could do all that invading and killing only because the US government steals hundreds of billions of dollars from its citizens via unconstitutional taxation.
More awesome photorealistic physics by a Stanford professor: http://graphics.stanford.edu/~fedkiw/
indeed ++1 
sorry for the delay in my response, I had to look up : prolifically. Couldn't find it.   Where can I sign up to the *IMakeMyOwnEnglishUp* Club?  I have a bunch of my own words I want to make mainstream: Quickerally Intellegentness Actionabilitied Swearablility Foreplayednesss    Anyway, (it's early.. forgive me) that is not what is meant here, it is not the quantity or pace of the self submitted postings, it was a comment on the self submission. UNless I completely missed it?
so tell me again, why would i want to use one? 
I don't have any problem with the site itself but I don't like the player. It takes too long to buffer anything.
Very awesome pics.  I'd love to see more
now that makes sense. i feel that bono should be able to keep his money since i think taxation tends to be onerous and way too high...but bono nagging governments to donate more of other people's money while minimizing his donations to his government *is* pretty hypocritical.
Wanted: 1. Hot Blonde with great hair and a great face 2. Must have perfect breasts and a sweet tush 3. Must have own career and be able to support me 4. Must be as dumb as a box of rocks  5. must belieeve everything I tell you, like "If you loved me you'd do it..."   Only women with first name of "Jessica" and last name of " Simpson" need apply.   ""Christinas" will be considered.
read it out loud... :)
Would you Like to Play a Nice Game of Chess?
My apologies.  Nothing is wrong with furl for saving stuff.  However, if you want to use furl to see what's popular (like here, del.icio.us) it's pretty much useless because of spambots.
yes.. many times...
he was kidding...
It’s a very pleasure for me announce my latest guest mix , available to the best dj mixes site present on www  I’m talking about deeprhythms.com.
Seems posts are still there somewhere e.g. http://nsfw.reddit.com/info/1no3/comments
The problem with government aid:  http://abcnews.go.com/2020/story?id=1955664&amp;page=1
i don't know about european countries but in the US the upper 5% of earners pay about 95% of the income taxes collected. i'd be willing to be that those statistics are similar in europe. the idea that the common workers pay the most taxes while the rich avoid them is a myth that isn't supported by the actual statistics. that being said, i certainly despise having 30-35% of my paycheck stolen before i even get it so that the US government can kill hundreds of thousands of people in iraq and pay out billions to special interests and politicians. particularly since the US constitution forbids the illegal tax scheme devised by the IRS.
Yes, am I white or black? Yes, white or black? Affirmative, white or black? Affirmative White Ready ..dammit READY!  
nsfw.reddit is a good way to pace one's self with a little bit of porn here and there.  It's easy to get overloaded with all the stuff from the usual sources of porn.
&gt;&gt;"Remember the claims that the PS2 could render Toy Story in real time?"   You mean Sony makes unrealistic and false claims?
No offense, but without Paul Graham reddit never would have caught on.  I, for one, never would have come here.  If you are going to truly clone YCombinator you might want clone Paul as well. 
Sometimes I wonder if the people buying Google stock have any idea how to value companies anyway. ;-) C'mon, $145 *billion*.  Google is worth 2.5 times more than Apple, more than ConocoPhillips or Chevron, more than Coke, nearly as much as China Mobile or Toyota, and more than half of Microsoft.  Could you see it making as much as any of them?
sounds like something the mayor would pull on south park...
Did you watch the video? Or are you saying everyone with anti-Hillary placards were slammed to the ground and headlocked, one by one?
This is more of a demonstration.
Licensing to third parties, eg. [Lipstick.com](http://lipstick.com/), [Slate](http://slate.reddit.com/), [New York Time](http://nytimes.reddit.com/). I kinda suspect that Lipstick.com is owned by Conde Nast, hence why they bought Reddit.  Most likely, all these old-line media businesses are scared that their business will evaporate to the web, so they're trying to buy up desirable web properties and get a jump on this new medium (hence NewsCorp's purchase of MySpace and Conde Nast's purchase of Reddit).
You mustn't have looked very hard. http://www.dict.org/bin/Dict?Form=Dict2&amp;Database=*&amp;Query=prolifically The definition there is rather literal; obviously I'm using the word in a metaphoric sense. Your second-to-last sentence made no sense to me.
But, what the reason?
She can - she just can't anymore cry rape if he doesn't. I'd say it's plenty reasonable that there's a point in the proceedings beyond which consent is considered a done deal.
Maybe I can't read, but how does one get this channel?  I'm sure the cable/sat companies aren't going to be jumping at the chance to get label terrorists by Dubya.
That's right nsfw.reddit was not what it could have been, but I want it back anyway, and that's because I hate when somebody is taking something away from me, and others... especially evil corporate moralists...
Actually, I laughed at these again, so I don't mind the dupe.
some of the shots look liked real wter but on a small scale model set...  thats funny how they recreated the "fake" look of models in water.
it ain't just about revenues, but also about cost of running the business.  manufacturing companies have way higher inventory costs and costs of production than an IT company like Google.
Strange, that was my least favorite part...
&gt; Libya is now in the Washington good books. Are you sure? Last i knew, they were in the "Beyond" axis of Libya, Cuba, and Syria. 
This was in the news several months ago; it appeared in the Boston Globe last winter(I think), just as Reddit was becoming popular.  People asked spez &amp; kn0thing about it, and apparently the Google offer was really low, probably a few hundred thousand.  I think we were speculating a couple million, and spez said that was way high.  It was really more like "Hey, you guys are cool, want a signing bonus?"
Ugh. God. Been a while since I thought about Seth Finkelstein.
Oh no, he's still tough. Chuck Norris snapped out a crescent kick so fast that it exceeded the speed of light (Chuck Norris does not submit to the laws of physics or biochemistry) and sent a wave of energy back to primoridal earth, where it energized a pool of organic molecules into the first self-replicating organisms. And *that's* what he means when he says we're not accidents or creations of random chance.
And what does this mean if 92% of weapons get through the Newark Airport?  It means that the ridiculously high level of security at airport ISN'T NEEDED.
Symbolics machines?
So you don't believe the carrier groups and other allied ships are even in the gulf?
it is really boring
hacks are what you use when you need something now and can't wait for the second coming ;)
I saw this list a while ago, and had a creative thought. How do you call an educational testing site? www.smartassess.com of course.
Has anyone actually tried this? I'm kind of excited, but not enough to go ahead and downgrade to Firefox 1.5 just to try it.
Asking your congressional representative &amp;#8800; "looking for trouble".
well.. they might just be looking for their 72 virgins...
Guys. No matter what the vote is, don't bring it back. It sucked when you had it, it will suck again. One thing that makes Reddit (IMNSHO) much more of an intellectually interesting waste of my time is that it doesn't  have this sort of cr*p. Chris @ Monster Labs
best submission of the day!
I have a feeling I'm going to be voted down by people who only read the title.  Oh well, I have faith that people will read the article.  *crosses finger*
Haven't you heard? These days, reality is democratic propaganda.
For large-scale projects, it's VERY helpful to have a more strictly structured object-oriented approach for the major components. Using things such as abstract methods and interfaces allow you to go back and adjust some of your core components and get detailed error messages for every component that also needs to be adjusted. Otherwise, you just have to hope you remembered to change everything that was affected, then have fun chasing down strange bugs for hours just to find out you forgot to implement a method on some object that was expected to be there. For the smaller details, it is overkill; use the simplicity that javascript offers. Not all code should be written in a strict classical manner. Many times it is overkill. In fact, for most uses on a web page it is overkill, and that is why many web developers won't see the value in this library. People often forget that javascript is for more than web pages. For example, this library is currently being used for the development of a portable application framework for cell phones. Complicated web applications are also quite different than the typical "web 2.0" page, and they can benefit from structure and error checking.
yet, here you are on the web posting comments to reddit.  just an observation.
The sound you now here is the collective haha wtfPWNED N00Bs!!! of every user who has had to call their (*long distance charges may apply) tech support clusterfuck. Account freeze this motherfuckars!!!
&gt;&gt;"Your second-to-last sentence made no sense to me"   you replied to laprice's comment about "overdoing it".  He did not mean the speed at which someone might submit their own articles, he meant the quantity.   (unless I am just an idiot)   Your reply:  &gt;&gt;"If you submit fast enough to be accused of overdoing it" This confused me, because "fast" isn't related to "quantity" so I asked for clarification in case I missed something  which I do do.. occasionally.. (LOL.. I said *"do do"*)   I asked what you meant by fast and you said "prolifically" which means, according to dict.com: &gt;&gt;"Producing young or fruit abundantly; fruitful; prolific." We will go with abundant here and that would mean quantity.. no? so you clarified "Fast", with "quantity"...you got it right the second time albeit with an odd use of a suffix on a word I didn't think ever needed one.   "prolifically"    &gt;&gt;"The definition there is rather literal; obviously I'm using the word in a metaphoric sense."  I bet your a hit at parties huh?   
Those links that got voted on was usually worth looking at, so I used to look at the top links for last month once in a while.
I agree. The fact that Allen has gotten as far as he has is a sad commentary on the state of politics.
But when can we do this real-time on my PC?
strange to see a common U.S. conservative argument on Slate.  we could audit Bono &amp; U2 if we wanted, but that would be just more delicious red herring. while bono is out campaigning for poverty relief and awareness of the terrible problems in Africa and such, conservatives in the U.S. have worked extremely hard to reduce the tax burden on both the rich and their highly profitable companies.  Articles like this, and a book I read through:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Do_as_I_Say_(Not_as_I_Do):_Profiles_in_Liberal_Hypocrisy ...about how rich Michael Moore and Ralph Nader are help this "conservative" cause beside simply pointing out character flaws.   Taxation for the rich is not a 'progressive' value but a socialist one.  there are plenty of people in this country who like high taxes on the wealthy, but the R-party here have worked to keep anyone with a voice who might support such a policy looking foolish with crafty PR and a string of followers who fall into arguments like the one in the article. Companies adapt &amp; so do individuals.  Calling someone a hypocrite for adapting to their situation is totally illogical and absolutely does not mean that 'liberals' are perfectly willing to play along if they get what they want out of governmental behavior.
maggy thatcher returns
Breathing? Call Me.
someone posted this exact same thing acouple of days ago and its still hilarious
I would be scared by this; except, I know the implementation will be so bad that no one would bother contributing to it.
Via Factcheck.org
That's meta-advertising. There's always room for niche-marketing ("you should buy *this*") within the larger paradigm ("you should buy").
therapist.com is my favourite. Therapists are supposed to know about this unconscious thing...
I'm guilty of doing that myself.  *lol*   
Your comment is moron propaganda
Brad's good friend of mine
Maybe one that isn't a jackass who goes around beating up older men. It probably took a lot of restraint not to hit Allen's thugs.
i dont know if it made by flash it's so clean!!
Nice title.  I thought they took out a contract on every American.
Those three guys were lucky that the Marine didn't go Chuck Norris on their asses.
Heh. First thought this was for the holes in me pockets.
Sounds like you're unfamiliar with how Bush runs his appearances.
Millions of sensible people are too high-minded to concede that politics  is almost always the choice of the lesser evil. "Tweedledum and Tweedledee,"  they say. "I will not vote." Having abstained, they are presented with a  President who appoints the people who are going to rummage around in their  lives for the next four years. Consider all the people who sat home in a  stew in 1968 rather than vote for Hubert Humphrey. They showed Humphrey.  Those people who taught Hubert Humphrey a lesson will still be enjoying the  Nixon Supreme Court when Tricia and Julie begin to find silver threads among  the gold and the black.   --*Russel Baker, "Ford without Flummery"*
Commenting doesn't even enter into the karma equation.  So anyone who comments and hasn't really submitted much probably has low karma.
Women should always be able to say no, but to convict and sentence someone to "rape" is a bit extreme if no is said after penetration. there should be a lesser "crime" perhaps? not guilty by reason of "ohmygodigottaramthischicknow" insanity?
thats not witty.. thats just sad.. very sad
&gt;...there was a day and a time when nobody would have blinked twice at someone getting their ass kicked for asking a man "Why did you spit on your first wife?" loudly in public. Really? When? And does "old" equal "right?"
i wonder if this is where arrested development got the idea for tobias' failed business card? :) Analyst + Therapist = analrapist http://the-op.com/media/image2.php?ep=303&amp;i=8855&amp;cat=6200
_You_ wouldn't want to use them. Stick with BASIC.
Man, somebody really hates Bono!
Truly amazing photos.
Why can't we let the creator of Ruby (Matz) define what Ruby is: From http://ruby-talk.org/cgi-bin/scat.rb/ruby/ruby-talk/179642 &gt;Subject: Re: Ruby's lisp features.  From: Yukihiro Matsumoto &lt;matz ruby-lang.org&gt;  Date: Mon, 13 Feb 2006 13:43:02 +0900  &gt;  &gt;Hi,  &gt;  &gt;In message "Re: Ruby's lisp features." on Mon, 13 Feb 2006 02:38:18 +0900, Edward Kenworthy &lt;edward kenworthy.info&gt; writes:  &gt;  &gt;|I've been programming for more years than I care to remember and am |enjoying programming in Ruby (especially on Rails). So far I've found |nothing "new" (to me) in Ruby, with the exception of the lisp-like |features and that's something I'd really like to explore. &gt;   |Anyone able to point me to a resource please?  &gt;   &gt;Ruby is a language designed in the following steps:  &gt;  &gt;  * take a simple lisp language (like one prior to CL).  &gt;  * remove macros, s-expression.  &gt;  * add simple object system (much simpler than CLOS).  &gt;  * add blocks, inspired by higher order functions.  &gt;  * add methods found in Smalltalk.  &gt;  * add functionality found in Perl (in OO way).  &gt;  &gt;So, Ruby was a Lisp originally, in theory.  Let's call it MatzLisp from now on. ;-) 
I assume they are blocking Google too then. Lots of porn there, even images.
you could think of it that way. or you could think that Slashdot was Yahoo, until Digg (Google) came along and rained on their parade.
Yes I'm pretty sure.  
I agree.  There's a point where it's also personally disgusting to me to see all these celebrities parading about for charity when in [reality](http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;q=celebrity+charity+fee&amp;btnG=Search)  they make substantial fees for showing up (perhaps without even having to donate at all).  Sure, their appearance likely drives donations, but there's something flawed here when a wealthy celebrity's appearance is their "donation" when the people really giving out the money are more likely to be earning less than the celebrity. I'm fed up with celebrity/wealthy entitlement.  If they see a problem and want it fixed, they should take the measures themselves to do so.  Take a lesson from Bill Gates.  He doesn't plead the general public to fund his cause/charity.  He puts his money where his mouth is, which is why others like Buffett will finance Gates' charities and not Bono's cause.  Seriously, Bono's richer than God and thinks he is the same, he could spend less time posing and running the circuit and more time in the trenches and, you know, writing checks.
Good article.  Very well written.
Nice thoughtful piece. I laughed at the end: "Michael Arrington told us that these stories of acquisition were his favorite part of the "entrepreneurial spirit", I couldn't help but think that somebody was missing the point." Mr. Arrington missing the point? I'm shocked, *shocked*!
well, dupe for new users.  I always thought expertsexchange was funny, because it comes up in my google searches alot.  penisland.net actually made me laugh out loud
It would be a very strange purchase if sellers would not know the price.
My point is to provide a counter-example to your sentiment that Python cannot be usefully compiled. Another counter-example, for Smalltalk, is [Strongtalk](http://strongtalk.org/).
I'm with David Cross on this one:  how about putting a man in an apartment...
Also, now its 11/1, how about changing the logo to have a green back it somewhere.  I know, they'd be those who wouldn't get the joke. Maybe my sense of humor is weird ;-)
I think dfranke means "frequently enough".
Are you middle aged and eating too much? Are you worried about ill health and getting old? Do you have whiskers and prefer wood shavings to down for your bedding? Researchers at Harvard University may have the answer to a healthier and longer life for you.
Recently Chuck Norris was quoted as saying:   Chuck Norris giveth and Chuck Norris rips your heathen, pagen  mother fucking spine out of your blashphemous devil worshipping pissant liberal pussy frame.  If you are overly sensitive, here is the toned down version: Chuck Norris giveith and Chuck Norris takeith away.   It's true, I read that quote by looking it up on The Google on the internets.   
Whats penetration....I've got my ball point right here.
in what world does fast = frequent?
That's what I'm saying; he's saying if you have low karma you're likely to be a troll. I'm saying no, if you have low karma you're likely to be a lurker.
Note to pedants everywhere: don't criticize someone's spelling or grammar and then follow it up with something like this: &gt; which I do do.. occasionally.. (LOL.. I said "do do")
Apparently, Chuck Norris does not understand biology, either.
i might be interested in taking this offer, if going there didn't get my throat slit, or , if i were a woman, have acid thrown on my face for not wearing a burqa/niqab/whatever. --vat
I have a strong hatred towards Paypal but that's a little extreme.
This is so cool, especially as an active desktop
The 3D grid is a big fixed array with changing value attached to it (namely, the velocities and the distance from the surface).  No, that is not remotely the idea of these particle systems. The particle systems you speak of are really bad at doing water, because a) if they just affect the position of each of their nearest peers, I would expect they wouldn't obey any kind of fluid flow or incompressibility constraints (which is what makes water look like water, and which is the point of having Navier-Stokes solver around to produce velocity fields), and b) Even if you advect the particles along the velocity field produced by a Navier-Stokes solver, which is certainly better than a), you still don't get any surface cohesion. That is, in order to advect them, you have to use numerical integration methods like Runge-Kutta or if you're lazy Euler's method. These methods have error. The error makes the particles start to disagree on where the surface is, and soon you have an ugly fuzzy surface.  Edit: If you're interested, read some academic papers on the topic, or a book. Some examples of such papers and such books are at  www.cs.stanford.edu/~fedkiw  and  http://www.cs.cmu.edu/~adamwb/ Navier-Stokes solvers have been around for quite a while so the papers on them need to be dug up some Google for Navier-Stokes fluid simulation and you should find something.
Honestly, has anyone not seen this before?!?! Someone want to repost star wars kid and badger badger incase people missed them the first ten thousand times around??? mod down
incredible
what was wrong with that Mr. English Teacher?   By the way.. I wasn't criticizing, I was making fun of..   mostly because I though prolifically sounded like a Bushism...
Bono and U2 have done more for world poverty, HIV education/treatment and social justice for the globe than most celebreties. Let them keep their money. They spend it more wisely than most.
This site is dedicated to Alcoholic Drinks and to people who get in trouble at work because their standard greeting is “Hey, let’s do a shot!”
What we really care about is quantity of submissions per unit time, so I think "fast" is more accurate, but I'm now done feeding the trolls in this thread.  Also, I second tofocsend.
&gt;&gt;"You're an idiot." see? 
They have to apply on broadcasting licenses in each country. In the UK it will broadcast through Sky.
Heh, I was gonna vote up JUST for the title.
Of course they are, they always are! The US military has always had a presence in this region, and has always been doing "war games" and other operations.  This article assumes this is specifically to strike Iran, which is nonsense.
As I said below, pretty damn close to never, since current methods require several hours of computation on a PC per few seconds of animation on a small grid.  For comparison, raytracing was invented in the 80s, and you still can't do it on your PC, because it's just fundamentally ridiculously expensive.
Or how about [Calling Sen Rick Santorum the frothy mixture of lube and fecal matter that is sometimes the byproduct of anal sex](http://www.santorum.com).  Or using [Impeach the Mother Fucker Already](http://www.itmfa.com) when referring to George W Bush. Both sides are dirty at times.
&gt; If interested, you can submit a request for porn.reddit.com..And depending on the number of votes it receives..You can get a porn subreddit.. &gt; But, I have to side with the reddit team on nsfw.reddit.com. It has become completely useless for people who want to post NSFW stuff which isn't just outright porn..(outright BAD porn, actually..) &gt; Seriously, did anyone submit anything other than (bad) porn on nsfw.reddit.com ? &gt; And for those of us who wanted to use nsfw.reddit for it's "intended purposes", I guess we can just use reddit.com and add '[NSFW]' to the title.. &gt; A search for NSFW on reddit gives the following results of which at least the top 25 seem pretty interesting.. http://reddit.com/search?q=nsfw&amp;s=highscore ------------------------------------------------- 
No, Reddit's bare-bones UI is more reminiscent of Google. Digg is more like Dejanews.
"Why do you continue to support the botched war in Iraq?" is asking a legitimate question.  It's even a hostile one, but still a legitimate question. "Why did you spit on your wife 30 years ago?" is looking for trouble. 
Wow, quality summary. I already know how they work, but if I didn't I'd want to send you cookies.
&gt;You obviously contradicted yourself; they arn't Secret Service, they're staff members/bodyguards. I don't know what they should do if he was a suicide bomber, and I doubt you do either. Shoot him? Bodyguards? Getting so angry and personal? No way. This was just some dick having a temper tantrum. &gt;How does a backpack immediately equate to a suicide bomber? I can think of a lot of other dangerous stuff you could put in a backpack... I don't know. I was making a guess. I was trying to imagine the tortured mental processes that resulted in the deranged idea that "backpack == danger." There are literally hundreds of different types of bags and clothing that *could* be used to hide a bomb or a weapon. Freaking out over every one isn't "caution" or "vigilance," it's crazy. It costs money, it causes tremendous inconvenience and stress, it causes far more false alarms than real ones, all without demonstrably making anyone safer. Defending an act of unnecessary violence based on the proximity of a backpack is essentially an insanity plea.
troll? Lol, I was making a joke at first and now that you don't like me.. I am a troll. That is the reddit dismiss. I need to start using that as well.
Henry Rollins was right about U2.  :)
I now have an image of a Marine intelligently designing three guys' *asses*, thankyouverymuch.
This was a lot of fun to write.  I hope you guys enjoy it, but if you haven't read any HP Lovecraft, or aren't familiar with the style, you probably won't get it. 
I currently don't have cable. Yes I know that usually these words are not usually used in the same sentence but unfortunately it's true. Had it not been for YouTube I would not have been able to enjoy these and other fascinating clips such as the Mentos+Diet Coke phenomena or the back flipping nun chuck guy. I am curious what the networks would think if they were to learn that I viewed their content without advertising which of course is used to pay for their content. I guess they may figure that I may decide to get cable at some time or another and choose to view their programming which I will still be able to view without advertising on the net.
yes, Wired
&gt; You can also get the code through Subversion Wouldn't it make a whole heap more sense to make the code available through darcs?
I was there when this was filmed.  The marine was being obnoxious.
SECRET MOON SEX TAPES!! $19.95 order now! 
carraway believes those are plants by Fox News and no lib could ever say such things but if they did, they weren't insults, they were the truth.
As far as I know, I think Zildjian is also the oldest company in the United States.
well I for one am sick of using logic on 'believers' of bullshit and expecting clarity from people who think the Earth was created, fossils and geologic structures intact, four or five thousand years ago because some monk counted the 'begats' in the bible before we had any understanding for how our world actually worked.  now, I would think it quaint and even valuable to have such people around but, if you haven't noticed, THEY'VE TAKEN OVER THE U.S. GOVERNMENT.
what joke was that? you were being sarcastic? Oh sorry,... I guess you didnt see mine either did you? Thanks for the Hollier than thou moment.
It'd be nice to have a nsfw subreddit with a different name with more juvenile nsfw humour, like I think nsfw was supposed to be initially
I was hoping I wasn't the only one who could see that this was an example of Republicans trying to politicize *ANYTHING* in an attempt to improve their showing in the polls -- or to discredit a possible Presidential contender -- or both.
"Those who do not read and understand history are doomed to repeat it." - Harry Truman
Sorry I am one of the [top digg submitters](http://digg.com/topusers?digsearch=elebrio) and don't usually waste my time on this site.  Would be nice if reddit used common sense html instead of this pseudo bbcode bullshit.  Must admit the commenting system otherwise is far superior here
The guns and ammunition in Half-Life came from either security guards or hostile military personnel. If you don't have a crowbar I may suggest swinging the nearest fire-extinguisher around until you find one.
Well Done Reddit Guys! UR living the dream ;)
The part that scares me is 'It's a brand new front in the war on terror.' Feels like they are trying to raise our acceptance of police state... Running man?
Exactly... nsfw.reddit.com != porn.reddit.com Also, it is interesting that this request for a *new* reddit does not use the existing request.reddit.com for the subreddit request.. http://request.reddit.com/ And, spez had his to say about nsfw.reddit.com:- &gt; Save it. Our intention for nsfw.reddit was for adolescent humor that, when on reddit itself, was causing users trouble at work. Unfortunately, it quickly degenerated into porn. Hopefully we'll make another attempt at the original goal in the future. http://reddit.com/info/olu8/comments/com7g The replies to spez's comments are also worth reading..
As long as he remembers that "Don't shoot!  I'm with the Science Team!" won't keep him from getting shot, he should be okay.
Great for photoshop, illustrator, maya3d, 3dsmax users and even more.
Couldn't have said it better myself :)
Dude, they have [real-time raytracers](http://www.realstorm.com/) now.
You're speaking about the U.S., right?
I'm a veteran and sorry to say it kids, but his words have a HUGE KERNEL OF TRUTH. I dropped out of college after doing well for a year, then failing miserably. The US Air Force was a great opportunity for me. I haven't been unemployed since serving four years on active duty, finished an associates degree right as I left, and have been enjoying my GI Bill benefits while finishing a bachelor's degree part time. I make a great living and enjoy life, but I'm quite a bit older than my peers. If anybody currently in school asked my advice, my words wouldn't be too far from Senator Kerry's - Stay in college and for God's sake don't join the military and get your ass shot off so some GOP dickhead can show he's got the biggest hardon for War...
Rocked by explosion.
I hope no one takes me wrong -- I'm totally against terrorist activity -- and if this was a bomb planted by *anyone,* IMO it was terrorist activity. But ebay so obviously cares Nothing about the buyers and sellers on its site, I am not surprised that someone "went over the edge."  Owned by the same company, PayPal seems to take more interest in customer service, but I am certain there are many disgruntled customers out there.
i want it be there again because it is art 
Yeah, which might justify a slightly higher P/E, but come on, trading at 60 times earnings?! The average market P/E in *good* times doesn't hardly ever top 24. And google is at 60?! There's no way they can grow revenues enough to justify the growth that's priced in.
My personal best: **Girlfriend Wanted** requirements: 2 Arms 2 Legs Votes Democrat
I'm pretty interested, it'll be an entirely new spin on news, one that we don't see here because our news media is all US-based.
That was the first time she got in the truck.  She didn't get in it twice.  Hence, she never "got in the again."
"Bush the divider of the nation. The polarizer. The formenter of civil discontent." Like Clinton wasn't?
interesting that the reddit buyout and the subsequent blog post by schwartz corresponds with an editorial by thomas friedman in the nytimes today saying technology, while vital to our lives, may also be destroying our sense of community. nothing replaces having real live, in the flesh friends, boyfriends, girlfriends, family, and human interaction.  Sites like reddit and their ilk are great because they give people a sense of belonging and community, but step away from your computer and suddenly it's all gone - it's just virtual afterall.  I suspect this is a little of what aaron may be feeling - he, and even more so, alexis and steve, spent countless hours living and breathing reddit, and they have really made a difference in people's lives. People's most important asset, their time, has been spent using something they built, and that's really cool.  All of us in startup land aspire to this.  But in the end, Reddit was just another "property" to be gobbled up by someone bigger, needing it for some strategic initiative. That's why i would bet that while most of us are very happy for the founders we have come to know and love, we also have a sense of loss - that something that has brought us all this virtual community won't quite ever be the same because there is now a big faceless corporation behind it instead of 4 guys coding all night in an apartment.
Is it because of your mother that you say that?
Upmodded because you make a good point. At the same time, recent reports about George Allan strongly suggest he's a violent, abusive asshole. This, in turn, strongly suggests that finding out how he treated his ex-wife and why he was arrested, is relevant to voters who are trying to decide whether to re-elect him.
